OVERSIGHT  OF 

THE  U.S.  DEPARTMENT  OF  COMMERCE 

S.  HRG.  110–1171 

HEARING 

BEFORE THE 

COMMITTEE ON COMMERCE, 

SCIENCE, AND TRANSPORTATION 

UNITED STATES SENATE 
ONE  HUNDRED  TENTH  CONGRESS 

FIRST  SESSION 

AUGUST  1,  2007 

Printed  for  the  use  of  the  Committee  on  Commerce,  Science,  and  Transportation 

( 

75–785 PDF 

WASHINGTON  : 

2012 

U.S.  GOVERNMENT  PRINTING  OFFICE

For sale by the Superintendent of Documents, U.S. Government Printing Office

Internet: bookstore.gpo.gov Phone: toll free (866) 512–1800; DC area (202) 512–1800

Fax: (202) 512–2104 Mail: Stop IDCC, Washington, DC 20402–0001

VerDate Nov 24 2008  08:56 Sep 17, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00001 Fmt 5011 Sfmt 5011 S:\GPO\DOCS\75785.TXT JACKIE

SENATE  COMMITTEE  ON  COMMERCE,  SCIENCE,  AND  TRANSPORTATION 

ONE  HUNDRED  TENTH  CONGRESS 

FIRST  SESSION 

DANIEL  K.  INOUYE,  Hawaii,  Chairman 

JOHN  D.  ROCKEFELLER  IV,  West  Virginia 
JOHN  F.  KERRY,  Massachusetts 
BYRON  L.  DORGAN,  North  Dakota 
BARBARA  BOXER,  California 
BILL  NELSON,  Florida 
MARIA  CANTWELL,  Washington 
FRANK  R.  LAUTENBERG,  New  Jersey 
MARK  PRYOR,  Arkansas 
THOMAS  R.  CARPER,  Delaware 
CLAIRE  MCCASKILL,  Missouri 
AMY  KLOBUCHAR,  Minnesota 

TED  STEVENS,  Alaska,  Vice  Chairman 
JOHN  MCCAIN,  Arizona 
TRENT  LOTT,  Mississippi 
KAY  BAILEY  HUTCHISON,  Texas 
OLYMPIA  J.  SNOWE,  Maine 
GORDON  H.  SMITH,  Oregon 
JOHN  ENSIGN,  Nevada 
JOHN  E.  SUNUNU,  New  Hampshire 
JIM  DEMINT,  South  Carolina 
DAVID  VITTER,  Louisiana 
JOHN  THUNE,  South  Dakota 

MARGARET L.  CUMMISKY,  Democratic  Staff  Director  and  Chief  Counsel 

LILA HARPER HELMS,  Democratic  Deputy  Staff  Director  and  Policy  Director 

CHRISTINE D.  KURTH,  Republican  Staff  Director  and  General  Counsel 

KENNETH R.  NAHIGIAN,  Republican  Deputy  Staff  Director  and  Chief  Counsel 

(II) 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  08:56 Sep 17, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00002 Fmt 5904 Sfmt 5904 S:\GPO\DOCS\75785.TXT JACKIE

C O N T E N T S 

Hearing held on August 1, 2007  .............................................................................
Statement of Senator Boxer  ....................................................................................
Statement of Senator Inouye  ..................................................................................
Statement of Senator Klobuchar  ............................................................................
Statement of Senator McCaskill  .............................................................................
Statement of Senator Smith  ...................................................................................
................................................................................
Statement of Senator Stevens 
Prepared statement  ..........................................................................................

Page 
1 
2 
1 
37 
36 
40 
4 
4 

Gutierrez, Hon. Carlos M., Secretary, U.S. Department of Commerce  ...............
Prepared statement  ..........................................................................................

5 
7 

WITNESSES 

Snowe, Hon. Olympia J., U.S. Senator from Maine, prepared statement 

..........

47 

APPENDIX 

(III) 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  08:56 Sep 17, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00003 Fmt 5904 Sfmt 5904 S:\GPO\DOCS\75785.TXT JACKIE

VerDate Nov 24 2008  08:56 Sep 17, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00004 Fmt 5904 Sfmt 5904 S:\GPO\DOCS\75785.TXT JACKIE

OVERSIGHT  OF 

THE  U.S.  DEPARTMENT  OF  COMMERCE 

WEDNESDAY,  AUGUST  1,  2007 

COMMITTEE ON COMMERCE, SCIENCE, AND TRANSPORTATION, 

The  Committee  met,  pursuant  to  notice,  at  2:35  p.m.  in  room 
SR–253,  Russell  Senate  Office  Building,  Hon.  Daniel  K.  Inouye, 
Chairman of the Committee, presiding. 

U.S. SENATE, 

Washington, DC. 

OPENING STATEMENT OF HON. DANIEL K. INOUYE, 

U.S. SENATOR FROM HAWAII 

The  CHAIRMAN.  Some  time  ago,  Mr.  Secretary,  President  Coo-
lidge said that the ‘‘business of America is business.’’ The business 
of  the  Commerce  Department  is  business,  as  well.  And  I  consider 
that,  from  my  service  on  this  Committee,  the  business  of  that  De-
partment  is  not  easy;  it’s  complex,  its  heavy-duty,  and  I’m  certain 
that, in the 2 years you’ve been on the job, you know that the busi-
ness of the Commerce Department is a demanding one. It includes 
conserving,  managing  the  ocean,  accuracy  in  standards  and  meas-
urements,  taking  care  of  the  census,  providing  economic  oppor-
tunity,  managing  spectrum  policy,  and  predicting  the  weather.  It 
goes from one end to the other. It’s not like one item; you have ev-
erything.  Your  business  is  not  only  promoting  commerce,  but  good 
stewardship  of  the  resources  that  dictate  our  economic  prosperity. 
This Committee, as you know, has been very active on issues re-
lated  to  your  Department.  We  have  held  more  hearings  than  our 
predecessor committees—on travel, tourism, scientific integrity, cli-
mate change research, public safety communications, trade policies 
enforcement,  viability  of  Earth-observing  satellites,  economic  com-
petitiveness,  science  policies,  digital  TV,  and,  most  recently,  Chi-
nese  imports.  These  hearings  have  highlighted  your  Department’s 
activities  and  missions  that  are  working,  and  some  that  need  our 
assistance.  And  I  think  many  of  them,  just,  as  I  indicated  earlier, 
are starved for resources. 

For  example,  we  have  read  the  Intergovernmental  Panel  on  Cli-
mate  Change’s  conclusions  that  human  activities  are  influencing 
our  planet’s  climate.  Scientists  agree,  and  have  testified,  that  we 
cannot  defer  any  longer,  and  the  time  to  act  is  now.  But  your  De-
partment  finds  it  difficult  to  address  the  fact  that  critical  weather 
and climate sensors have been eliminated from the next-generation 
Polar-orbiting  Operational  Environmental  Satellites.  We’d  like  to 
help you on this. 

(1) 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  08:56 Sep 17, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00005 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6633 S:\GPO\DOCS\75785.TXT JACKIE

2 

On  the  brighter  side,  the  trade  deficit  increased  to  only  $60  bil-
lion,  which,  incidentally,  is  the  same  level  that  you  experienced 
when  you  appeared  before  us  in  January  for  your  confirmation. 
During that hearing, every member of the Committee that day said 
the  same  thing,  every  member  said,  ‘‘I’m  for  fair  trade,  but  we 
must enforce our trade laws.’’ Our trade deficit is always static, but 
our concern today is safety in trade. 

The  Department’s  largest  agency,  NOAA,  has  a  direct  role  to 
play  when  it  comes  to  contaminated  imports  of  seafood.  In  2005, 
more  than  84  percent  of  the  total  fish  and  shellfish  consumed  in 
the U.S. was imported, compared to 55 percent in 1995. And China 
is the second largest importer of seafood to the United States. 

NOAA’s seafood inspection program provides services beyond the 
mandatory  hazard  analysis  and  critical  control  points,  including 
vessel and plant sanitation, product inspection, grading and certifi-
cation, label review, lab analysis, and training. The seafood inspec-
tion  of  NOAA  is  so  vital  to  America’s  ability  to  send  exports 
abroad, such as the European Union, where they require FDA cer-
tification  on  all  seafoods  entering  their  market.  In  fact,  NOAA’s 
program  is  so  successful  that,  in  a  January  2004  GAO  report,  it 
recommended  that  NOAA  provide  staff  from  its  seafood  inspection 
program to bolster the FDA’s inspection capability. 

Finally,  I—along  with  14  of  my  colleagues  on  this  Committee— 
I  think  this  is  very  important,  that’s  over  half  of  us—come  from 
coastal  states,  so  I  can  assure  you  that  we  think  highly  of  NOAA 
and the importance of NOAA, and there’ll be many questions about 
it. Many of us believe that NOAA’s missions are critical to the well- 
being  of  our  Nation,  whether  it’s  hurricane  forecasting,  drought 
forecasting,  or  fisheries  management,  or  scientific  research  in 
human health and ocean. 

Similarly,  what  has  become  a  growing  concern  for  us  is  the  no- 
growth budget under which NOAA has been operating. While I can 
understand, the budget has been no-growth in just about every de-
partment,  other  than  DOD,  there  is  much  focus  on,  and  support 
for, promoting science and technology research in order to spur eco-
nomic innovation, and the allure of the oceans attracts and inspires 
young  people  to  study  science.  The  America  COMPETES  Act, 
which  you  are  familiar  with,  which  we  hope  will  pass  before  the 
August recess, calls for NOAA to be a full partner in the efforts to 
promote  competitiveness.  And  I  hope  that  you  will  take  this  direc-
tion  to  heart,  and,  if  possible,  improve  the  budget  allocation  for 
that agency. 

I’d  like  to  call  upon  Senator  Boxer  before  I  call  upon  you,  Mr. 

Secretary. 

Secretary GUTIERREZ. Thank you. 
The CHAIRMAN. Senator Boxer? 

STATEMENT OF HON. BARBARA BOXER, 

U.S. SENATOR FROM CALIFORNIA 

Senator  BOXER.  Thank  you  so  very  much,  Mr.  Chairman,  for 

holding this hearing, and for your leadership. 

As  Chairman  of  the  Environment  and  Public  Works  Committee, 
my remarks today will focus on NOAA and its work regarding glob-
al warming. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  08:56 Sep 17, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00006 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6633 S:\GPO\DOCS\75785.TXT JACKIE

3 

The  Commerce  Department  is,  as  you  pointed  out,  very  impor-
tant  to  us,  and  especially,  for  me,  as  Chair  of  that  Committee,  the 
work that you do to understand and predict changes in our planet’s 
environment,  and  also  the  work  you  should  do  to  conserve  and 
manage our Nation’s coastal and marine resources. 

Mr. Chairman and Mr. Secretary, last Friday I flew to Greenland 
with  nine  other  members  of  the  U.S.  Senate.  It  was  a  bipartisan 
delegation. We went to see with our own eyes what the impacts are 
of  global  warming  on  some  of  our  highly  vulnerable  Arctic  areas 
and people. What we learned on our visit was that the warming of 
the  Earth  is  having  an  effect  on  the  massive  Greenland  Ice  Sheet, 
which holds 10 percent of the world’s fresh water, and which could 
raise  sea  levels  by  23  feet  if  it  were  to  melt  entirely.  And  to  put 
that  into  context,  my  understanding  is  that  in  Katrina  in  some 
places there was a 20-foot rise. So, you just—see, just from Green-
land, what this can mean. 

We  saw,  up  close  and  personal,  the  effect  of  warming  on  the  ice 
sheet  and  the  acceleration  in  melting  that  has  happened  in  recent 
years.  Much  of  what  we  saw,  Mr.  Secretary,  was  informed  by  im-
ages and readings taken from space by satellites. And I’m going to 
show  you—you  could  see—this  satellite  image  of  Greenland,  and 
some  things  are  only  visible  from  space—you  could  see  how  unbe-
lievable  this  ice  sheet  is.  And,  if  I  might—Michael,  bring  it  over— 
this  is  the  piece  that  has  broken  off—that  has  calved  off  the  main 
ice  sheet.  And  this  sheet  that  we  saw—we  flew  over  and  we  saw, 
with  our  own  eyes,  melting  into  the  ocean—is  5  feet  wide  and  500 
miles  long.  It  was  awesome.  It  was  as  close  to  God  as  I’ve  ever 
come. And I think everyone on our trip shared that experience. 

So, the image shows the Greenland Ice Sheet and this area that 

we flew over that has broken off of the main sheet. 

We  are  at  a  crucial  time  in  our  history.  Global  warming  is  the 
greatest challenge, in my opinion, faced by mankind, and we’re just 
beginning to understand the full effect it’s having on our planet. 

Satellites  are  essential  to  that  task,  so  my  first  message  to  you, 
sir, is, please help us. Loss of satellites and sensing systems threat-
en  to  blind  us—blind  us—just  at  a  time  that  we  need  the  clearest 
vision. 

One  of  the  key  points  that  was  made  by  the  IPCC,  which  was 
co-authored  by  NOAA  scientist  Susan  Solomon,  was  that  we  can 
expect  increased  intensity  of  hurricanes  from  future  global  warm-
ing. Senator Inouye talked about that. Certainly his home is imper-
iled  by  hurricanes.  And  the  NOAA  satellites  are  absolutely  essen-
tial  in  monitoring  weather  patterns  and  tracking  dangerous  hurri-
canes.  If  we  lose  this  capacity,  or  even  if  this  capacity  is  dimin-
ished,  we  might  be  able  to  use  the  European  satellite,  called 
ASCAT,  but,  as  one  scientist  put  it,  that  would  be  like  a  person 
who wears glasses taking them off. We should not unilaterally dis-
arm  and  count  on  other  countries  to  help  us.  So,  we  need  to  make 
sure  we  have  sufficient  satellite  capacity  to  continue  and  improve 
on what we’re already doing, to monitor weather patterns and glob-
al warming, and to track hurricanes, in particular. 

So, you, sir, are on the front lines of fighting global warming. It’s 
essential that you have all the tools that you need. I mentioned the 
funding for key satellites. It’s essential that scientists be free from 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  08:56 Sep 17, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00007 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6633 S:\GPO\DOCS\75785.TXT JACKIE

4 

political  interference  and  allowed  to  present  their  research  to  the 
public,  whatever  their  views,  so  that  the  true  facts  about  global 
warming are known. I was deeply disturbed by reports from earlier 
this  year  that  the  Administration  was  interfering  with  the  ability 
of  NOAA  and  NASA  scientists  to  present  the  results  of  their  re-
search  to  the  public.  To  me,  any  kind  of  muzzling  of  people,  who 
we  pay—the  taxpayers  pay  their  money  to  find  out  what  they 
think—any  kind  of  muzzling,  whether  direct  or  indirect,  is  unac-
ceptable, I believe, to all of us on this Committee, regardless of our 
political  party.  NOAA  scientists  are  among  the  best  in  the  world, 
and we need to make sure they have the right tools to monitor our 
planet,  watch  our  weather,  protect  our  oceans,  and  give  us  unbi-
ased opinions. 

So,  with  that,  Mr.  Chairman,  I  would  yield  back  and  thank  you 

so much for this important hearing. 

The CHAIRMAN. I thank you very much, Senator. 
And  now  may  I  recognize  the  Vice  Chairman,  Senator  Stevens. 

STATEMENT OF HON. TED STEVENS, 

U.S. SENATOR FROM ALASKA 

Senator  STEVENS.  Well,  thank  you  very  much.  Just  a  few  com-
ments,  Mr.  Chairman,  and  then  I’ll  ask  you  to  put  my  full  state-
ment in the record. 

Mr.  Secretary,  I  know  you’re  very  busy.  I  commend  you  and  the 
Administration  for  your  efforts  to  improve  our  American  economy 
and  its  growth.  The  GDP  growth  is  2.9  percent  annually  since 
2001. The unemployment rate is below the average of the past dec-
ades.  And,  with  the  budget  set  to  be  balanced  by  2012,  I  think 
every American is going to benefit from your policies. So, I look for-
ward  to  learning  about  the  continued  progress,  and  future  activi-
ties of your Department. 

I’d ask that my full statement be printed in the record. 
The CHAIRMAN. Without objection, so ordered. 
Senator STEVENS. Thank you. 
[The prepared statement of Senator Stevens follows:] 

PREPARED STATEMENT OF HON. TED STEVENS, U.S. SENATOR FROM ALASKA 

Thank  you,  Mr.  Chairman,  for  calling  this  hearing  today.  Thank  you,  Secretary 
Gutierrez, for making time in your busy schedule to come testify today. I commend 
you  and  the  Administration  for  your  efforts  to  improve  the  American  economy  and 
business.  With  GDP  growth  of  2.9  percent  annually  since  2001,  an  unemployment 
rate  below  the  average  of  past  decades,  and  with  the  budget  set  to  be  balanced  by 
2012, every American is benefiting because of your policies. I look forward to discov-
ering what the Committee can do to maintain such a strong economy. 

A  strong  economy  begins  with  a  strong  education  in  sciences,  mathematics,  tech-
nology, and engineering. I am pleased to report that last night the conference report 
of the America COMPETES Act was signed. This measure was introduced last Con-
gress  and  represents  a  major  step  to  improve  American’s  competitiveness  through 
increased  funding  for  basic  research  and  education  programs,  which  I  hope  will  be 
quickly implemented. 

In  today’s  market  many  goods  and  services  are  sold  over  the  Internet.  This  E- 
trade is especially beneficial for Alaskans who in many cases would not have access 
to the same variety of goods otherwise. The Internet also provides a means for Alas-
kans to sell their goods in the lower 48. In addition, access to the Internet provides 
educational  and  medical  opportunities.  To  ensure  Alaskans  and  all  Americans  can 
afford access to the Internet, I believe Congress should extend the Internet tax mor-
atorium and prevent Federal, state, and local Internet taxes, which would only drive 
up the cost; and look forward to hearing your thoughts on this issue. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  08:56 Sep 17, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00008 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\75785.TXT JACKIE

5 

Our  Nation’s  coastlines  are  important  to  the  ecology  and  to  the  economy.  Nearly 
half of the Nation’s coastline and half of the Nation’s fisheries landings are in Alas-
ka. As such, I have particular interest in the tsunami warning system, hydrographic 
surveys,  water  and  climate  services,  coastal  zone  management,  and  fisheries  and 
marine mammal research run by NOAA. I applaud the work done to date and look 
forward to hearing about the status of the Department’s conservation programs and 
work with the fishing and aquaculture industries. 

Another  important  part  of  the  Nation’s  economy  is  the  travel  and  tourism  sector 
contributing  over  8  million  employment  opportunities  and  $1.3  trillion  in  economic 
activity  every  year,  which  also  has  a  significant  impact  in  Alaska.  Following  Sep-
tember  11,  this  sector  took  a  dramatic  hit.  To  correct  this  problem  the  Committee 
has passed the Travel Promotion Act of 2007. This measure will promote the United 
States as a travel destination. 

The CHAIRMAN. And now, Mr. Secretary? 
STATEMENT OF HON. CARLOS M. GUTIERREZ, SECRETARY, 

U.S. DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE 

Secretary  GUTIERREZ.  Thank  you.  Thank  you,  Chairman  Inouye 
and  Vice  Chairman  Stevens.  Senator  Boxer,  it’s  a  pleasure  to  be 
back in front of this Committee. 

It’s a pleasure to come before you today to talk about the Depart-
ment  of  Commerce,  an  agency  which  I  have  proudly  led  for  more 
than  two  and  a  half  years.  Above  the  doors  of  the  Department  of 
Commerce  is  President  Thomas  Jefferson’s  mandate  to  cultivate 
peace and commerce with all, a vision we continue to pursue today. 
The  roots  of  the  Department  are  firmly  grounded  in  promoting 
commerce  and  economic  growth,  and  exercising  stewardship  over 
our oceans and waterways. Over the course of the past 6 years, our 
economy  has  faced  a  series  of  challenges,  whether  it  be  from  a  re-
cession,  to  the  attacks  of  9/11.  But  our  country’s  resiliency  has 
shown through, and our economy has overcome enormous obstacles. 
Today  I  would  like  to  briefly  highlight  a  few  of  the  Department’s 
top  priorities  in  protecting  our  environment  and  keeping  our  econ-
omy strong. 

The  Administration’s  pro-growth  policies,  of  lower  taxes,  coupled 
with  the  hard  work  and  ingenuity  of  American  workers,  has  put 
our  economy  on  solid  footing.  We  have  experienced  sustained  eco-
nomic  growth  and  enhanced  job  creation,  resulting  in  increased 
revenues  and  a  reduced  deficit.  The  U.S.  economy  has  experienced 
23  consecutive  quarters  of  growth,  over  which  time  growth  has 
averaged  2.7  percent  annually.  Unemployment  is  at  a  low  of  four 
and  a  half  percent,  and  payroll  jobs  have  increased  by  more  than 
8  million  since  August  of  2003.  And,  to  your  point,  Mr.  Chairman 
and  Vice  Chairman  Stevens,  that  four  and  a  half  percent  is  below 
the  average  of  the  past—each  of  the  past  four  decades.  And,  be-
cause of President Bush’s tax cuts, the average American taxpayer 
will  keep  an  additional  $2,200  of  their  hard-earned  money  this 
year. 

We  are  strengthening  our  overall  economic  position  by  creating 
an export culture. Last year, we had a record of $1.4 trillion in ex-
ports,  and  the  growth  rate  of  exports  outpaced  the  growth  of  im-
ports.  And  exports,  year  to  date,  are  up  by  10.8  percent  over  the 
same  period  in  2006.  That’s  more  than  twice  the  rate  of  growth  of 
imports.  We  are  trading  and  engaging  more,  but,  then  again,  so  is 
everyone else, so we must keep focused on growth and the competi-
tiveness of the U.S. economy. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  08:56 Sep 17, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00009 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\75785.TXT JACKIE

6 

Keeping  our  environment  healthy  helps  keep  America  competi-
tive.  The  scientific  understanding  gained  through  NOAA’s  re-
nowned  researchers,  combined  with  the  broader  scope  of  this  De-
partment’s mandate, have placed Commerce at the forefront of the 
President’s  efforts  to  tackle  the  long-term  challenges  and  opportu-
nities brought by climate change. 

This  Administration  has  demonstrated  a  clear  commitment  to 
the  stewardship  of  our  oceans—of  our  Nation’s  environment  and 
oceans.  This  includes  the  President’s  Ocean  Action  Plan  and  the 
creation  of  the  largest  fully  protected  marine  conservation  area  in 
the  world.  It  also  includes  the  introduction  of  aquaculture  legisla-
tion,  which  we  are  pleased  Chairman  Inouye  and  Vice  Chairman 
Stevens have introduced. And, while I know that some are nervous 
about the competition brought about by the growth of aquaculture, 
this  is  not  a  market  opportunity  in  which  the  U.S.  can  afford  to 
lose  out.  Further,  exploring  aquaculture  is  an  example  of  how 
America can broaden and increase its overall competitiveness. 

Innovation  is  another  of  our  competitive  advantages.  Our  highly 
skilled workforce, together with the pro-business environment that 
we have created, have kept us on the cutting edge of global innova-
tion.  However,  to  maintain  that  leadership  position,  we  must  not 
be complacent. Commerce is helping cultivate American innovation 
through  the  American  Competitiveness  Initiative,  the  basic  re-
search  of  NIST,  and  the  protection  of  intellectual  property  of  the 
Patent and Trademark Office. In fact, every bureau at our Depart-
ment is focused on competitiveness. 

An  enormous  contributor  to  America’s  innovative  engine  has 
been  the  explosion  of  wireless  communications  in  recent  decades. 
The  transition  to  digital  television  broadcasts  is  an  historic  oppor-
tunity  to  reclaim  and  reassign  valuable  broadcast  television  spec-
trum to other important uses, including public safety and advanced 
wireless services. 

Through  the  Census  Bureau,  the  Commerce  Department  height-
ens  our  Nation’s  competitive  position  by  providing  an  accurate, 
timely portrait of our people and the economy. I’m pleased to report 
the  2010  Census  is  on  track.  The  goal  of  the  Census  Bureau,  the 
Administration,  and  of  this  Congress,  is  to  count  every  resident  of 
the  United  States  once,  and  only  once,  and  in  the  right  place.  To 
do  that,  we  have  had  the  support  of  Congress  over  the  decade  to 
fund  a  re-engineered  Census,  and  we  need  your  support  this  year 
and throughout the funding cycle. 

My  comments  today  are  just  a  snapshot  of  a  much  broader  pic-
ture.  My  written  testimony  provides  a  more  extensive  review  of 
what  the  men  and  women  of  the  Commerce  Department  are  doing 
every single day to ensure the growth, the prosperity, the competi-
tiveness, and the long-term stability of our Nation’s economy. 

I  thank  you  for  the  invitation  to  be  here,  and  I  look  forward  to 

working with you and continuing to keep this economy on track. 

Thank you, Mr. Chairman. 
[The prepared statement of Secretary Gutierrez follows:] 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  08:56 Sep 17, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00010 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\75785.TXT JACKIE

7 

PREPARED STATEMENT OF HON. CARLOS M. GUTIERREZ, SECRETARY, 

U.S. DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE 

Chairman  Inouye,  Vice  Chairman  Stevens,  distinguished  Members  . . .  it  is  my 
pleasure  to  come  before  you  today  to  talk  about  the  Department  of  Commerce,  an 
agency which I have proudly led for more than two-and-a-half years. 

Above  the  doors  of  the  Department  is  President  Thomas  Jefferson’s  mandate  to 
‘‘Cultivate  peace  and  commerce  with  all.’’  This  mission  has  been  at  the  forefront  of 
our Nation’s consciousness since the earliest days of our democracy, even before the 
Department’s  founding,  and  is  indeed  the  foundation  for  America’s  system  of  free 
enterprise. 

More  than  a  century  after  the  Department’s  creation,  we  continue  to  pursue  Jef-
ferson’s vision. The roots of the Department are firmly grounded in promoting com-
merce and economic growth, and exercising stewardship over our oceans and water-
ways. 

Over the course of the past 6 years our economy has faced a series of challenges, 
from a recession to the attacks of 9/11. But America’s resiliency has shown through 
and our economy has overcome seemingly insurmountable obstacles. We are now in 
a  strong  economic  position  and  the  values  of  democracy  and  open  markets  which 
have given us a position of global leadership have again carried us through. 
Environment Stewardship while assisting Economic Development 

Today I would like to start by discussing our role as stewards of our Nation’s envi-
ronment.  Nearly  60  percent  of  the  Department’s  budget  (FY08)  is  dedicated  to  in-
creasing  knowledge  and  rational  use  of  the  natural  environment.  Through  the  Na-
tional  Oceanic  and  Atmospheric  Administration  (NOAA)  the  Department  holds  cru-
cial  responsibility  for  our  Nation’s  oceans  and  waterways,  our  marine  fisheries,  our 
weather  service,  and  a  host  of  other  resources  aimed  at  utilizing  our  national  geo-
graphic  and  geophysical  attributes  to  strengthen  our  economy  while  protecting  our 
valuable resources. 

This  Administration  has  demonstrated  a  clear  commitment  to  our  environment, 
dedicating  unprecedented  resources  toward  stewardship  of  our  oceans  and  water-
ways. 

The  U.S.  Ocean  Action  Plan,  which  President  Bush  announced  in  late  2004,  has 
resulted  in  a  number  of  significant  accomplishments  that  have  served  to  advance 
our  understanding  of  oceans,  coasts,  and  Great  Lakes;  enhance  the  use  and  con-
servation of our ocean, coastal and Great Lakes resources; manage coasts and their 
watersheds;  support  maritime  transportation;  and  advance  international  ocean 
science and policy. 

As  part  of  that  coordinated  effort,  we  have  established  the  Papaha¯naumokua¯kea 
Marine National Monument, the largest fully protected marine conservation area in 
the world; introduced the Coral Reef Conservation Amendments Act of 2007; worked 
with  Congress  to  reauthorize  the  Magnuson-Stevens  Act,  which  requires  an  end  to 
overfishing by 2010; and worked with scientists, resource managers, and other inter-
ested parties across the country to prioritize ocean science efforts to ensure that fu-
ture actions continue to be based on sound science. 

Aquaculture  is  an  innovative  response  to  the  projected  global  shortage  of  40  mil-
lion  tons  of  seafood  by  2030.  Of  the  4.9  billion  pounds  of  seafood  consumed  in  the 
United  States  in  2006,  roughly  83  percent  was  imported.  We  need  both  a  strong 
commercial fishing industry and a robust aquaculture industry to meet growing de-
mands  for  a  safe,  reliable  source  of  seafood,  to  reduce  U.S.  dependence  on  seafood 
imports,  and  to  strengthen  the  economies  of  some  of  our  coastal  communities.  We 
are  pleased  that  Chairman  Inouye  and  Vice  Chairman  Stevens  introduced  the  Na-
tional  Offshore  Aquaculture  Act  of  2007  to  address  this  economic  growth  oppor-
tunity, and we look forward to working with the Committee and Congress to ensure 
passage. 

Beyond  the  conservation  and  stewardship  missions  that  NOAA  carries  out,  the 
Department,  through  NOAA’s  National  Weather  Service,  touches  the  daily  lives  of 
every  American  by  providing  up-to-the-minute  weather  information,  which  helps 
protect people and property through the dissemination of forecasts, observations and 
climate data. 

Additionally,  through  NOAA,  the  Department  serves  the  vast  needs  of  our  Na-
tion’s oceans and waterways—a vital part of our economic and transportation infra-
structure.  Earlier  this  year,  we  proposed  the  reauthorization  of  the  Hydrographic 
Services  Improvement  Act,  a  bill  to  promote  safe,  efficient  and  environmentally 
sound  maritime  commerce  in  U.S.  waters  with  accurate  nautical  charts  and  other 
navigational  tools.  This  bill  coincides  with  the  200th  anniversary  of  the  Coast  Sur-
vey, another of President Thomas Jefferson’s great gifts to this country. Waterborne 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  08:56 Sep 17, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00011 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\75785.TXT JACKIE

8 

commerce  contributes  $1  trillion  to  our  Nation’s  GDP  and  supports  more  than  13 
million jobs. We thank the Commerce Committee for passing this important legisla-
tion in July. 

The  scientific  understanding  gained  through  NOAA’s  renowned  researchers,  cou-
pled  with  the  broader  scope  of  this  Department’s  mandate,  have  placed  Commerce 
at  the  forefront  of  this  Administration’s  efforts  to  tackle  the  long-term  challenges 
and  opportunities  brought  by  climate  change.  The  Department  plays  a  central  role 
in  measuring  and  understanding  changes  in  our  climate  as  well  as  crafting  inter-
national  and  domestic  policies  that  will  help  the  American  people  and  the  global 
community  mitigate  and  adapt  to  a  changing  planet.  As  President  Bush  said,  ‘‘My 
Administration’s  climate  change  policy  will  be  science-based,  encourage  research 
breakthroughs  that  lead  to  technological  innovation,  and  take  advantage  of  the 
power of markets. It will encourage global participation and will pursue actions that 
will  help  ensure  continued  economic  growth  and  prosperity  for  our  citizens  and  for 
citizens throughout the world.’’ 

In  the  10  years  since  the  Kyoto  Protocol  was  negotiated,  there  has  been  a  false 
premise  among  some  that  countries  must  be  committed  to  Kyoto  to  be  taken  seri-
ously  in  discussions  on  climate  change.  The  President  does  not  subscribe  to  this 
view, and instead has led with actions and results. This Administration has devoted 
$37 billion to climate change research and technology since 2001 and has requested 
an additional $7.4 billion for FY 2008. 

The  President  recognizes  technological  advances,  more  than  anything  else,  are 
needed to truly reduce our greenhouse gas emissions, which is why this Administra-
tion  launched  the  Climate  Change  Technology  Program,  led  by  the  Department  of 
Energy and supported by Commerce. In his most recent State of the Union Address, 
the  President  set  aggressive  goals  to  reduce  our  dependence  on  gasoline  by  20  per-
cent over the next 10 years through a series of mandatory, voluntary and incentive- 
based  programs.  This  Administration  is  also  fully  committed  to  deploying  tech-
nologies domestically and internationally through programs such as FutureGen and 
the  Asia-Pacific  Partnership  for  Clean  Development  and  Climate,  where  Commerce 
plays  a  leading  role  in  promoting  exports  of  clean  technology.  By  implementing  an 
aggressive yet practical strategy, we are on track to meet the President’s goal to re-
duce  greenhouse  gas  intensity  18  percent  by  2012,  while  continuing  to  grow  the 
American economy. Indeed, preliminary data from the Energy Information Adminis-
tration  show  that  in  2006  energy-related  carbon  dioxide  emissions  fell  1.3  percent 
while the economy grew 3.3 percent. 

On May 31, 2007, the President called upon the world’s major economies to work 
together  to  develop  a  post-2012  framework  and  identify  a  global  goal  on  long-term 
greenhouse gas reductions. The United States will host the first of a series of meet-
ings  with  other  countries—including  rapidly  growing  economies  like  India  and 
China—to  establish  a  new  framework,  which  will  recognize  that  economic  growth, 
energy  security  and  climate  change  must  be  addressed  in  an  integrated  way.  Our 
progress  toward  a  global  emissions  reduction  goal  will  be  underpinned  by  midterm 
national  targets  and  programs  that  are  tailored  toward  each  participant’s  current 
and future energy needs and that will be subject to a robust review process. In addi-
tion,  participants  will  work  on  sectoral  approaches  to  energy  intensive  industries 
and  concrete  steps  to  promote  the  development  and  deployment  of  clean  energy 
technologies.  As  part  of  his  international  initiative,  the  President  also  proposed 
strengthening  climate-related  initiatives  at  the  U.N.  that  benefit  all  countries,  in-
cluding  adaptation  to  climate  change,  deforestation  and  technology.  Finally,  the 
President’s  initiative  addresses  practical  action  necessary  to  advance  the  global  de-
velopment and deployment of clean energy technologies. This could include low-cost 
capital sources to finance investment in clean energy, mechanisms to share govern-
ment-developed  technology  at  low  cost,  or  in  some  cases,  no  cost  at  all,  and  elimi-
nation of market barriers. 

At  Commerce,  we  play  a  role  in  all  aspects  of  the  policy  solutions  to  climate 
change. NOAA plays a central role in measuring changes in our atmosphere and in 
our  climate.  We  are  extremely  proud  of  our  scientists,  and  their  research  and  mod-
eling  formed  the  basis  for  much  of  the  science  encapsulated  in  the  Intergovern-
mental  Panel  on  Climate  Change’s  Fourth  Assessment,  that  has  been  released  this 
year.  Through  a  number  of  research  programs,  the  agency  is  focused  on  providing 
decisionmakers  with  a  clear  understanding  of  the  global  climate  system.  At  the  di-
rection  of  the  President,  NOAA  is  leading  U.S.  efforts  to  implement  a  truly  global- 
observing  system.  Building  off  of  the  data  provided  by  our  observation  systems, 
NOAA is focusing research to understand key climate processes, improving our mod-
eling capabilities and developing and delivering climate information services. NOAA 
is working to improve our understanding of global climate change and develop tools 
to enable regional and local leaders to make effective planning decisions. These tools 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  08:56 Sep 17, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00012 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\75785.TXT JACKIE

9 

could also one day be used to monitor and verify that claimed emissions reductions 
are also taking place. 

The  International  Trade  Administration  (ITA)  is  leading  U.S.  Government  efforts 
to  spur  the  deployment  of  clean  energy  technologies  and  the  National  Institute  of 
Standards  and  Technology  (NIST)  is  leading  efforts  to  create  international  stand-
ards for biofuels as well as for improving energy efficiency. Ultimately, the solutions 
to the challenges of climate change will rest with strong and vibrant economies that 
can make the investments necessary to transform our energy infrastructures. 
A Strong and Vibrant U.S. Economy 

This Administration’s pro-growth policies of lower taxes and a less restrictive gov-
ernment,  coupled  with  the  hard  work  and  ingenuity  of  American  workers,  has  put 
our  economy  on  solid  footing.  We  have  experienced  sustained  economic  growth  and 
enhanced job creation, resulting in increased revenues and a reduced deficit. 

The U.S. economy has experienced 23 consecutive quarters of growth, over which 
time  growth  has  averaged  2.7  percent  annually.  When  adjusted  for  inflation,  our 
economy is 17 percent larger than it was in 2001. Our unemployment rate is a low 
4.5  percent,  which  is  below  the  average  of  each  of  the  1960s,  1970s,  1980s  and 
1990s,  and  payroll  jobs  have  increased  by  more  than  eight  million  since  August 
2003. And, because of President Bush’s tax cuts, the average American taxpayer will 
keep an additional $2,200 of their hard-earned money this year. 

While we are weathering a correction in the market, we remain near historic lev-
els of home ownership, with 75 million American families owning their own homes. 
And,  by  asserting  fiscal  discipline  and  reigning  in  discretionary  spending,  the 
President’s goal to balance the budget by 2012 is on track. An Office of Management 
and Budget (OMB) report issued in mid-July forecasts a $43 billion decrease in the 
deficit  this  year.  For  3  years  in  a  row  the  Federal  deficit  has  declined  and  OMB 
now  projects  that  the  budget  deficit  has  fallen  to  1.5  percent  of  GDP,  well  below 
the 40-year average of 2.4 percent of GDP. We have also held the growth of annual 
domestic  spending  close  to  1  percent,  which  is  well  below  the  rate  of  inflation.  And 
tax relief we have implemented since 2001 has allowed the American people to keep 
$1.1 trillion of their hard-earned dollars, which they can determine how best to allo-
cate. 

One  important  way  in  which  we  are  strengthening  our  overall  economic  position 
is by creating an export culture in our country. Last year, the growth rate of exports 
outpaced  the  growth  rate  of  imports,  13  percent  to  10  percent,  with  a  record  $1.4 
trillion  in  exports.  And  exports  year-to-date  are  up  by  10.8  percent  over  the  same 
period in 2006 to $644 billion—more than twice the rate of imports. 

Increased exports to markets around the world benefit our country enormously by 
supporting higher paying jobs for our workers here in America and by boosting pro-
ductivity, which drives our national prosperity. Free Trade Agreements (FTAs) also 
help  our  companies,  farmers  and  manufacturers  by  leveling  the  playing  field  and 
helping them sell American goods and services to millions of consumers in new glob-
al markets. 

Truly,  America  is  embracing  the  global  marketplace  and  taking  advantage  of  the 
markets  that  this  Administration  has  sought  to  open.  Yet,  while  we  are  taking  ad-
vantage  of  the  opportunities  of  the  global  marketplace,  we  know  we  are  not  alone 
in  those  efforts.  Nations  around  the  world  have  awakened  to  the  possibilities  of 
international trade. And with the addition of three billion consumers in China, India 
and Russia, which have opened their previously shuttered economies, we have expe-
rienced a wave of new customers, new consumers, and new competitors. 

Trade  accounted  for  17  percent  of  world  GDP  in  1986.  Last  year  it  accounted  for 
29 percent. We are trading and engaging more—but so is everyone else. That is why 
we must be focused on the growth and competitiveness of the U.S. economy. 
Expanding the Global Marketplace and Boosting U.S. Exports 

The  Department  of  Commerce  has  a  tremendous  role  to  play  in  expanding  the 
global  marketplace  and  boosting  U.S.  exports.  Our  recently  released  National  Ex-
port Strategy, produced by the ITA in conjunction with other trade agencies, details 
how  the  combination  of  declining  trade  barriers  and  advancing  technologies  has 
made exporting easier than ever. 

Since President Bush took office, Free Trade Agreements (FTAs) with 11 countries 
have  entered  into  force,  bringing  the  total  number  of  countries  that  we  have  FTAs 
with to 14. Exports to the countries with FTAs that entered into force between 2001 
and 2006 grew faster than U.S. exports to the rest of the world. And while the FTA 
countries  make  up  only  7.5  percent  of  the  world’s  GDP  (excluding  the  USA),  more 
than 42 percent of all U.S. exports go to our FTA partners. Clearly, free trade agree-
ments are directly linked to the expansion of our exports. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  08:56 Sep 17, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00013 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\75785.TXT JACKIE

10 

In  Chile,  two-way  trade  over  the  first  3  years  of  our  free  trade  agreement  rose 
by more than 150 percent, including 22 percent so far this year. And the FTA with 
our CAFTA–DR partners is already showing positive results, with exports up to the 
five countries up 16 percent last year. 

These  agreements  serve  to  open  markets  for  U.S.  goods,  support  good  jobs  for 
Americans at home and abroad, and importantly, help export good governance, cre-
ate stable markets and reduce poverty in emerging economies. 

After  more  than  3  years  of  negotiations,  Congress  will  consider  FTAs  with  Peru, 
Colombia, Panama and South Korea. These agreements, if approved, would provide 
further access to 126 million consumers with a combined GDP of $1.1 trillion. Each 
holds  important  geopolitical  significance  in  strategic  regions  of  the  globe—here  in 
our own region, the Western Hemisphere, and in the rapidly rising Pacific Rim. 

In order to continue an aggressive agenda of opening foreign markets and leveling 
the  playing  field  to  boost  U.S.  exports,  this  President  and  future  presidents  must 
have  Trade  Promotion  Authority,  an  essential  tool  to  ensure  our  continued  export 
success. Many of our trading partners, including Asia and the European Union, are 
acting  bilaterally  to  engage  with  each  other.  The  United  States  cannot  afford  to  sit 
on the sidelines. 

Renewed Trade Promotion Authority will help the United States continue to play 
a  leadership  role  in  multilateral  and  bilateral  trade  negotiations.  A  successful  con-
clusion to the Doha Development Agenda will result in economic growth and devel-
opment,  especially  in  the  world’s  poorer  countries,  by  creating  new  trade  flows  and 
disciplining subsidies. 

The  Department,  through  ITA,  also  takes  a  direct  approach  to  boosting  U.S.  ex-

ports by helping American companies succeed in the international marketplace. 

We  have  conducted  a  number  of  successful  trade  missions  bringing  U.S.  busi-
nesses face-to-face with potential customers, business partners and government offi-
cials.  Last  fall  I  led  a  business  development  mission  to  China,  a  vital  and  growing 
market for U.S. exports. And ITA led the largest-ever U.S. Government business de-
velopment mission to India. 

Earlier  this  year  ITA  also  led  a  clean  energy  trade  mission  to  India  and  China 
to  promote  U.S.  export  of  technologies  which  will  help  address  environmental  con-
cerns  in  those  countries,  while  boosting  U.S.  exports.  We  also  announced  recently 
a trade mission to Vietnam which will take place this fall. 

In addition to enhancing competitiveness through a successful export strategy, the 
Commerce  Department  has  recently  launched  the  ‘‘Invest  in  America  Initiative’’  to 
encourage  foreign  firms  to  invest  directly  in  the  U.S.  economy.  U.S.  subsidiaries  of 
foreign companies employ more than five million American workers in jobs that pay 
32  percent  higher  wages  than  the  national  average.  And  while  we  have  historically 
been  the  world’s  most  attractive  destination  for  foreign  direct  investment  (FDI),  it 
again is another area of the economy in which we are facing stepped up competition 
and therefore must take on a more aggressive, proactive posture. 

While  promoting  exports,  the  Department  also  advances  U.S.  national  security 
and  foreign  policy  objectives.  Our  Bureau  of  Industry  and  Security  (BIS)  accom-
plishes this work by implementing an effective export control and treaty compliance 
system,  while  promoting  continued  U.S.  strategic  technological  leadership.  BIS  en-
sures  that  U.S.  exports  of  certain  sensitive  items  are  kept  away  from  dangerous 
countries,  organizations  and  individuals  in  a  manner  that  preserves  the  innovative 
and  productive  capacity  of  American  industry.  Importantly,  we  believe  the  Export 
Administration  Act  of  1979,  which  expired  in  2001,  must  be  renewed  to  ensure  a 
streamlined and strengthened export control system, particularly in light of modern 
threats. 
Ensuring a Level Playing Field for U.S. Workers and Industry 

As global trade barriers come down and international economies become more in-

tegrated, it is critical that our companies compete on a level playing field. 

We  welcome  the  innovation  and  efficiencies  that  result  when  our  companies  and 
industries  compete.  However,  we  must  insist  that  our  trading  partners  play  by  the 
rules. When they have not, we have taken an aggressive stance in safeguarding our 
companies from unfair practices, while preserving the benefits of open, market-driv-
en economics. 

From  day  one,  this  Administration  has  demonstrated  it  will  use  every  tool  at  its 
disposal to enforce our trade laws. We play by the rules and it is only fair to expect 
others  to  do  the  same.  That  is  why,  in  March  of  this  year,  I  announced  the  Com-
merce  Department’s  preliminary  decision  to  apply  the  U.S.  anti-subsidy  law  to  im-
ports of glossy paper from China. 

China  is  a  rising  economic  power—our  second  largest  trading  partner—and  rep-
resents  a  tremendous  opportunity  for  U.S.  businesses.  But  when  we  find  unfair 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  08:56 Sep 17, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00014 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\75785.TXT JACKIE

11 

trading  practices,  as  we  did  with  the  glossy  paper  case,  we  will  work  to  ensure  an 
equitable,  level  playing  field.  These  actions  also  serve  to  encourage  important  re-
forms in China, spurring its government to hasten change and keep pace with inter-
national standards and practices. 

To  that  end,  ITA  has  initiated  more  anti-dumping  cases  against  China  than  any 
other  Administration.  The  Administration  has  also  filed  five  WTO  cases.  These  ac-
tions show our continued commitment to create an environment of true competition 
for American manufacturers, workers and farmers. 

The  responsibility  for  change  is  in  the  hands  of  the  Chinese.  We  have  commu-
nicated  that  the  safety  of  our  food,  medicines  and  other  products  from  our  trading 
partners is of paramount importance. This is a watershed moment for China. China 
must  address  U.S.  safety  concerns.  It  is  in  the  interest  of  all  parties  for  China  to 
be  part  of  the  international  trade  community  and  be  fair  and  open  in  its  economic 
dealings. 

One  of  this  Administration’s  top  priorities  is  to  ensure  that  our  trading  partners 
fully comply with their trade agreements with us, and that our businesses, workers, 
and  farmers  get  the  full  benefits  of  the  agreements  we  negotiate  on  their  behalf. 
The  most  timely  and  effective  way  to  achieve  compliance  goals  is  often  through 
prompt diplomatic efforts. 

To  that  end,  Commerce’s  Trade  Agreements  Compliance  program  draws  on  the 
joint  expertise  of  all  Commerce  Department  resources  to  help  U.S.  exporters,  par-
ticularly small and medium-sized businesses that face foreign trade barriers. Begin-
ning  in  FY  2001,  we  have  initiated  over  620  compliance  cases  and  closed  over  450. 
A final way by which we help keep the playing field level for American companies 
and  workers,  is  by  ensuring  the  protection  of  their  intellectual  property  (IP).  IP  in-
dustries represent 40 percent of U.S. economic growth and employ 18 million Ameri-
cans  in  good,  high-paying  jobs.  Intellectual  property  accounts  for  over  one-third  of 
the  value  of  all  publicly  traded  U.S.  corporations,  an  amount  equal  to  almost  half 
of  the  U.S.  GDP.  In  Fiscal  Year  2006,  the  U.S.  Patent  and  Trademark  Office 
(USPTO), a Commerce agency, granted 183,187 patents. 

Protecting  those  patents  is  an  economic  and  national  security  objective,  which  is 
why  we  have  a  coordinated  effort  which  includes  USPTO,  the  National  Intellectual 
Property Law Enforcement Coordination Council and ITA. That effort is the Strategy 
Targeting Organized Piracy (STOP!) which holds the ambitious goal of ending trade 
in  counterfeit  goods.  We  have  also  placed  Intellectual  Property  Rights  attache´s  in 
strategic markets around the world such as India, China and Russia to promote in-
tellectual property enforcement. 

Innovative and creative people in this country and around the globe are producing 
new  products,  medicines,  and  art.  As  a  result,  our  lives  are  safer,  healthier,  more 
productive and richer. We know that losses to our economy due to IP theft are enor-
mous,  harming  workers,  threatening  consumers  and  striking  at  our  most  competi-
tive industries. Through STOP! we are working to end this scourge, and we will con-
tinue working with our trading partners around the world to ensure that the protec-
tion of intellectual property is a vital part of our bilateral and multilateral relation-
ships. 

While  we  work  to  ensure  a  level  playing  field,  we  continue  to  acknowledge  that 
isolationism  won’t  protect  people  or  protect  jobs.  Our  strategy  is  to  grow  exports, 
not  limit  imports.  Protectionism  doesn’t  protect  the  economy  or  jobs.  Only  innova-
tion, entrepreneurship, competition and investment will protect and grow jobs. 
Providing the Data Needed to Keep our Economy Growing 

Another  important  channel  through  which  the  Department  of  Commerce  actively 
helps  promote  U.S.  economic  competitiveness  is  by  providing  an  information  infra-
structure that supplies businesses, government entities and private citizens with the 
information they need to make informed decisions. 

Through the Economics and Statistics Administration (ESA), which is home to the 
Bureau of Economic Analysis (BEA) and the Census Bureau, the Commerce Depart-
ment  provides  the  information  infrastructure  for  vital  economic  and  demographic 
data  ranging  from  retail  sales  and  quarterly  gross  domestic  product  calculations  to 
housing  and  population  figures.  The  Commerce  Department  heightens  our  Nation’s 
competitive position by providing an accurate, timely portrait of our people and the 
economy, thereby helping to support effective investment decision-making, maintain 
macro-economic  stability  and  guide  public  policy  decisions.  Most  importantly,  I  can 
report that the 2010 Census is on track. The Census Bureau has re-engineered this 
decennial  count  of  U.S.  residents  using  technology—like  GPS  and  handheld  com-
puters—to make the enumeration ever-more accurate. 

The decennial census is the largest non-military mobilization the Federal Govern-
ment  conducts.  It  directly  affects  how  many  seats  each  state  has  in  the  House  of 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  08:56 Sep 17, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00015 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\75785.TXT JACKIE

12 

Representatives  and  how  those  district  lines  are  drawn.  An  accurate  census  count 
is  also  vital  in  determining  how  over  $200  billion  in  Federal  funds  are  allocated  to 
local  and  state  governments.  The  goal  of  the  Census  Bureau,  the  Administration, 
and of this Congress is to count every resident of the United States once, only once, 
and  in  the  right  place.  To  do  that,  we  have  had  the  support  of  Congress  over  the 
decade  to  fund  a  re-engineered  census  that  uses  improved  technology  and  method-
ology to deliver a good count and enhanced data about the characteristics of our peo-
ple. We need your support this year and throughout the funding cycle. 

The President’s Budget for 2008 continues the re-engineering and funds two crit-
ical  components.  The  first  I  want  to  mention  is  the  dress  rehearsal  next  April.  Al-
ready, Census is preparing for the dress rehearsal in Stockton, CA, and Fayetteville, 
NC,  by  checking  household  addresses  and  noting  new  construction.  A  census  dress 
rehearsal is just like one on stage. This is the time to check the lighting and tweak 
a line or two. It is not the time to rewrite the plot. Given the scope and complexity 
of  a  decennial  census,  new  operations  cannot  be  added  that  are  not  tested  in  the 
dress  rehearsal.  I  would  note  that  we  are  getting  good  feedback  from  Stockton  and 
Fayetteville about the handheld computers that will be used in 2010. 

In  addition,  the  President’s  Budget  includes  money  to  kick  off  the  integrated  de-
cennial  communications  plan.  It  is  critical  to  the  census  that  we  reach  out  to  com-
munities that are more difficult to count. Communities may be harder to enumerate 
because of language barriers, mistrust of government, or simply because people are 
busier  and  it  is  a  challenge  to  find  them  at  home.  For  these  reasons,  we  need  to 
educate  the  public  about  the  importance  of  the  census  and  enlist  local  leaders  and 
neighbors  to  support  our  efforts.  The  integrated  communications  plan  will  do  just 
that. 
Encouraging and Enhancing Innovation and Competitiveness 

Innovation  is  the  engine  that  fuels  our  Nation’s  economy.  The  United  States  is 
home  to  the  most  highly  skilled,  creative  and  motivated  workforce  in  the  world. 
That human capital coupled with the pro-business environment we have cultivated, 
which  encourages  risk-taking  and  entrepreneurship,  have  kept  us  on  the  cutting 
edge of global innovation. 

However,  to  maintain  that  leadership  position  we  must  not  be  complacent.  That 
is  why  the  President  created  the  American  Competitiveness  Initiative  (ACI),  in 
which the Department of Commerce plays an important role. The ACI commits $136 
billion  over  10  years  to  increase  investment  in  R&D,  strengthen  education  and  en-
courage  innovation.  The  sum  total  of  these  efforts  will  contribute  to  strengthening 
our ability to stay competitive. 

NIST, which is part of Commerce, promotes basic research funded by the Federal 
Government,  an  essential  component  of  the  ACI.  And  while  we  encourage  R&D  at 
the governmental level, we also must promote the involvement of the private sector, 
which is why the ACI aims to make permanent the R&D tax credit. 

Smart  business  and  investment  decisions  are  made  with  predictability  and  visi-
bility  into  the  future.  By  providing  a  long-term  outlook  for  R&D,  the  Federal  Gov-
ernment  can  help  bring  the  private  sector  more  actively  into  the  business  of  basic 
science, sharpening our Nation’s competitive edge. 

To  further  support  innovation,  we  continue  working  with  this  Committee  as  the 
NIST reauthorization legislation (H.R. 2272 and S. 761) makes its way through the 
conference  process.  Both  of  these  bills  recognize  the  importance  of  NIST’s  research 
to  our  Nation’s  global  competitiveness,  and  authorize  much-needed  increases  in  the 
NIST  core  (laboratory  and  construction)  funding  accounts.  We  encourage  Congress 
to authorize levels for the NIST core that meet the Administration’s request. 

In  addition,  while  the  bill  does  make  changes  to  the  Malcolm  Baldrige  National 
Quality  Award  program,  the  Administration  requests  that  the  Congress  amend  the 
Stevenson-Wydler  Act  to  change  the  name  of  the  award  to  the  ‘‘Malcolm  Baldrige 
Quality,  Innovation  and  Performance  Excellence  Award’’  to  better  reflect  the 
award’s  updated  criteria  and  greater  emphasis  on  innovation  and  performance  ex-
cellence. 

Another  way  in  which  Commerce  is  addressing  America’s  economic  competitive-
ness is by looking at how we measure innovation. Last fall, I announced the forma-
tion  of  the  Measuring  Innovation  in  the  21st  Century  Economy  Committee.  The 
Committee  will  help  develop  metrics  that  can  correctly  measure  American  inge-
nuity,  which  we  know  contributes  to  our  advances  in  productivity  and  our  high 
standard of living. 

We are currently gathering the input of experts from the business, academic and 
policy  arenas  to  help  the  Committee  as  it  develops  ideas  for  innovation  metrics.  I 
look forward to reporting back on the progress of their work and developing a better 
national understanding of the impact innovation has on our economy. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  08:56 Sep 17, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00016 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\75785.TXT JACKIE

13 

An  enormous  contributor  to  America’s  innovative  engine  has  been  the  explosion 
of  wireless  communications  in  recent  decades.  Consequently,  the  demands  on  the 
use  of  the  radio  frequency  spectrum  are  rapidly  increasing  at  a  rate  that  raises 
questions regarding the viability of this natural resource to sustain these ever grow-
ing demands and to provide additional services. 

To  address  the  need  to  better  manage  this  resource,  the  National  Telecommuni-
cations  and  Information  Administration  (NTIA)  has  launched  the  Commerce  Spec-
trum  Advisory  Committee,  which  is  part  of  the  President’s  Spectrum  Policy  Initia-
tive.  The  initiative  was  established  by  President  Bush  in  June  2003  to  develop  a 
policy  for  the  21st  century  that  meets  the  Nation’s  needs  and  spurs  economic 
growth. 

The  transition  to  digital  television  broadcasts  is  a  historic  opportunity  to  reclaim 
and reassign valuable broadcast television spectrum to other important uses, includ-
ing public safety and advanced wireless services. The digital transition will have im-
portant benefits to the economy, public safety, and the Federal budget. 

As  part  of  our  efforts  to  improve  public  safety  through  the  digital  transition,  in 
July  we  announced  a  $1  billion  Public  Safety  Interoperable  Communications  Grant 
Program.  These  are  one-time,  targeted  Federal  grants  with  the  purpose  of  helping 
state  and  local  public  safety  agencies  improve  their  ability  to  communicate  with 
each other when responding to hazards. 

An  essential  component  of  a  pro-growth  and  pro-innovation  agenda  is  perma-
nently  extending  the  moratorium  on  Internet  access  taxes.  The  Administration 
urges  Congress  to  make  permanent  the  current  moratorium  which  expires  in  No-
vember. 

Under the leadership of the NTIA, Commerce is well underway with the planning 
and  preparation  for  the  digital  television  transition  which  will  help  consumers  con-
tinue to receive free, over-the-air television when full-power television stations cease 
analog broadcasting in 2009 as authorized by Congress. 

Another  essential  aspect  of  U.S.  competitiveness  is  immigration.  We  must  ac-
knowledge that the demographics are not on our side. We cannot grow our economy 
at 3 percent a year while our population in the prime working years will only grow 
0.3  percent  per  year  over  the  next  7  years.  We  will  have  to  turn  to  immigration  to 
help  meet  our  economy’s  needs.  The  issue  of  immigration  reform—at  the  high  and 
low  skilled  ends—will  not  go  away.  It  is  a  fundamental  economic  competitiveness 
issue and something we must address. 

Innovation and competitiveness are also promoted by the Department’s Economic 
Development  Administration  (EDA).  EDA  invests  in  locally  developed,  regionally 
based  economic  development  initiatives  that  achieve  the  highest  return  on  the  tax-
payers’  investment  and  directly  contribute  to  regional  and  national  economic 
growth. EDA places a strong emphasis on making investments that: (1) support in-
novation  and  competitiveness,  (2)  encourage  entrepreneurship,  and  (3)  support  col-
laborative regional economic development approaches. 

Minority-owned  businesses  represent  a  growing  segment  of  the  economic  land-
scape.  Commerce’s  Minority  Business  Development  Agency  (MBDA)  and  its  nation-
wide  network  of  business  assistance  centers  promote  competitiveness  by  providing 
technical  and  managerial  assistance,  and  business  consulting  services  designed  to 
enhance the growth of the minority business community. 

And while I am on the subject of MBDA, I would like to take a moment to specifi-
cally  acknowledge  the  good  work  that  agency  has  done  in  helping  restore  the  Gulf 
Coast.  Soon  after  Hurricane  Katrina  devastated  the  Gulf  Coast,  MBDA  established 
five  technical  and  managerial  assistance  business  centers  on  behalf  of  Minority 
Business  Enterprises  (MBEs)  in  the  Gulf  region,  (Louisiana,  Mississippi  and  Ala-
bama).  MBDA  also  hosted  a  series  of  Gulf  Coast  Business-to-Business  Linkage  and 
Investment Forums designed to increase MBE capacity in the region by encouraging 
joint ventures and teaming arrangements between Gulf Coast 8(a) firms and MBDA 
clients  from  around  the  country.  As  a  result,  MBDA  has  provided  consulting  serv-
ices and educational outreach activities to thousands of MBEs. 

These  are  just  a  few  of  the  many  areas  in  which  the  Department  of  Commerce 
is actively working to encourage, enhance and support innovation to build our econ-
omy. 

The Department of Commerce plays a critical role in the growth, competitiveness 
and  long-term  stability  of  our  Nation’s  economy.  And,  as  I  said  before  this  very 
Committee during my confirmation hearing in January 2005, I strongly support the 
Department’s  mission  of  ‘‘creating  conditions  for  economic  growth  and  opportunity 
by  promoting  innovation,  entrepreneurship,  competitiveness  and  environmental 
stewardship.’’ 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  08:56 Sep 17, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00017 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\75785.TXT JACKIE

14 

It  is  my  privilege  to  be  at  the  helm  of  a  Department  with  so  many  vital  roles  to 
play.  I  look  forward  to  continuing  my  role  at  the  Department  and  working  every 
day to keep America leading in the global economy. 

The CHAIRMAN. I thank you very much, Mr. Secretary, and thank 

you for your service to our Nation. 
May I call on the Vice Chairman. 
Senator  STEVENS.  Thank  you  very  much.  I’m  pleased  to  have 

your statement, Mr. Secretary. 

I must start off on aquaculture. When we introduced the bill that 
you sent up from the Department and the Administration, Senator 
Inouye and I did so by request, and I’ve put in an amendment con-
cerning  aquaculture:  finfish.  I’ve  since  visited  extensively  with  the 
scientists  and  the  members  of  various  coalitions  in  my  state,  and 
there’s  still  great  fear  about  the  concept  of  aquaculture  within  our 
200-mile limit and beyond. We have half the coastline of the United 
States,  and  we  harvest  more  than  50  percent  of  all  the  fish  that— 
domestically  produced—that  Americans  consume.  We  think  you 
ought  to  experiment  with  what  we  call  the  South  48,  and  see  if 
there’s  any  damage  to  those  areas  there,  before  the  pristine  area 
off  our  state  is  intruded  upon.  The  majority  of  our  sea  coast  is 
owned by the Federal Government. 

The pollution capability in Alaska is very low. And yet, the pollu-
tion capability coming from finfish operations that were improperly 
managed could be extensive. So, I would urge you—before going on 
to  any  other  questions—consider  just  exempting  Alaska  from  that. 
I’m  not  sure  about  Hawaii,  whether  it  wants  to  be  exempted,  too. 
But  it  doesn’t  have  the  commercial  fisheries  going  on  around  their 
islands that we do. They have local fisheries, but I don’t think they 
have the national and international fisheries we have. 

We  have  the  largest  biomass  of  fish  in  the  world  now,  pollock, 
and  we  have  the  greatest  salmon  run  in  the  world  today  now,  to 
Bristol  Bay.  And  they’re  already  at  risk  from  some  developments 
onshore.  We  would  like  to  postpone  further  risk  until  we  really 
know what is the impact of finfish aquaculture that’s offshore. And 
I  hope  that  you’ll  consider—I’m  not  asking  you  for  a  commitment, 
I’m  just  asking  you  to  heed  our  request  and  take  it  into  consider-
ation as you make decisions. 

Secretary GUTIERREZ. Yes, sir. 
Senator STEVENS. If you have any comment, I’ll be glad—— 
Secretary  GUTIERREZ.  Yes,  Vice  Chairman  Stevens,  we  have  re-
ceived comments back from the Committee on our aquaculture pro-
posal, and one of them, of course, is an opt-out for the states—and, 
very  specifically,  finfish  in  Alaska.  And  we  are  very  well  aware  of 
that concern for you, and are very aware that this is important for 
you. So, I’m sure that, in the end, we can come up with something 
that  will  satisfy  your  concerns  and  will  take  into  account  the  opt- 
out desires of Alaska. 

Senator STEVENS. Thank you very much. 
We’re looking now at the next generation of satellites for the pro-
grams  that  are  already  in  place,  in  terms  of  the  Geostationary 
Earth  Orbiting  Satellite  and  the  Polar-orbiting  Operational  Envi-
ronmental  Satellites.  Can  you  tell  us  of  any  great  changes  in  your 
plans?  Or  what  are  you  going  to  do  about  those  satellites?  Both  of 
them  are  getting  a  little  bit  old.  And  we,  I  think,  ought  to  know 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  08:56 Sep 17, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00018 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\75785.TXT JACKIE

15 

what  the  plan  is  for  the  future.  Some  of  the  sensors  involved  al-
ready on those satellites, I am told, have been downgraded or aban-
doned.  Are  you  working  on  a  plan  for  other  satellites  for  a  future 
of dealing with these satellites? 

Secretary  GUTIERREZ.  We  have  begun  the  planning  work  on 
GOES–R, the new generation of the GOES, geostationary satellite. 
On  NPOESS,  which  is  the  new  generation  for  the  POES  satellite, 
the Polar-orbiting satellite, we have had to submit a Nunn-McCur-
dy  request,  because  we  did  have  an  overrun,  Mr.  Chairman.  And 
what  we  have  done—and  we  believe  that  this  is  a  good  solution— 
we  have  had  to  reduce  the  number  of  sensors,  but  each  sensor— 
my  understanding—will  be  of  a  higher  caliber.  So,  we  believe  that 
we are well equipped, that we are well armed. We have had to deal 
with  some  cost  overruns.  We’ve  had  the  suppliers  in,  we’ve  talked 
with them. I’m not used to anything over a 25 percent cost overrun. 
I used to have to go to the board for anything over 10 percent. This 
has  been  a  significant  overrun.  But  we  do  believe  that,  when  we 
have  the  satellites  up  and  running  on  time,  that  we  will  be  fully 
equipped,  as  we  are  today,  to  detect  any  patterns—any  weather 
patterns,  any  climate  changes.  We  are  well  equipped  to  do  the 
work we need to do, Mr. Vice Chairman. 

Senator  STEVENS.  You  don’t  expect  that  we’ll  have  to  consider 

putting up another satellite in the near term? 

Secretary  GUTIERREZ.  Well,  the  current  plan  on  the  NPOESS 
goes out to, I believe, 2012. There was some discussion recently on 
QuikSCAT.  We  believe  that  QuikSCAT  will  be  operational  until 
2011. So, at this point, we have our plans in place for the next gen-
eration.  We  believe  those  plans  are  adequate.  And  we  will  obvi-
ously  have  to  adjust,  if  we  need  to,  but  we  are  well  covered  going 
out to about 2011. 

Senator  STEVENS.  OK.  Just  a  couple  of  other  quick  questions. 

There are others who want to ask questions. 

We  are  looking  now  at  the  IUU  fisheries,  the  International  Un-
regulated  Unreported  fisheries.  Just  in  this  last  trip  home,  I  was 
told that there’s every evidence that these vessels that are unregis-
tered and, really, operating under flags of convenience—they’re out 
there  in  the  North  Pacific,  and  have  intercepted,  now,  immature 
salmon  as  they  intermix  on  the  high  seas.  And  we,  unfortunately, 
are dealing with a budget that’s pretty tight, and with a paradigm 
now  that  Senators  can’t  say,  you  know,  another  $10  million  is 
needed  here  or  there,  because  of  the  earmark  problem  we’re  all 
dealing with. What are we going to do? Are you in a position where 
you  can  come  into  the  budget  now  and  ask  for  additions  to  the 
budget when we see a crisis like this? There is no question of what, 
there’s  a  crisis  in  dealing  with  IUU  vessels—illegal,  unreported, 
unregulated.  They’re  taking  fish  and  taking  literally—and  col-
lecting them when they’re immature, and dumping them in foreign 
markets  that  treat  them  like  sardines  rather  than  salmon.  Now,  I 
can’t add any more money now. Can you do anything? 

Secretary GUTIERREZ. IUU Fishing, associated with stateless ves-
sels  operating  on  the  high  seas  as  well  as  vessels  from  distant- 
water  fishing  slates  exploiting  the  resources  of  coastal  states  with 
weak enforcement regimes, also occurs in fisheries managed by re-
gional  fishery  management  organizations.  The  issue  is  receiving 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  08:56 Sep 17, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00019 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\75785.TXT JACKIE

16 

growing  attention  due  to  its  impacts  on  target  fish  stocks,  habitat, 
fish markets, bycatch, and competition with legal fishing. 

The  Magnuson-Stevens  Fishery  Conservation  and  Management 
Reauthorization Act of 2006 provides NOAA Fisheries with new au-
thority  to  combat  IUU  fishing  activities.  NOAA  Fisheries  is  devel-
oping rulemaking to implement these measures, which include pro-
cedures  to  identify  and  certify  nations  whose  vessels  are  engaging 
in, or have been engaged in, IUU fishing activities. 

NOAA  Fisheries  will  continue  to  work  with  the  Department  of 
State  and  the  U.S.  Coast  Guard  to  pursue  a  cooperative  multilat-
eral  approach  to  combating  IUU  and  will  also  use  bilateral  meet-
ings  as  an  opportunity  to  explore  how  the  United  States  might 
work more closely with other countries on the issue of IUU fishing. 
Senator STEVENS. Well, you may be right, but we think it’s com-
ing  from  other  nations  in  the  world  who  have  these  vessels  and 
send  them  out  to  just  find  fish  wherever  they  are.  And  they’re 
using methods that are almost outlawed, like drift nets. 

Secretary GUTIERREZ. Right. 
Senator  STEVENS.  We  hope  that  the  Administration  will  join  us 
and  go  to  the  U.N.  and  talk  about  IUU  fisheries,  talk  about  reg-
istering  fishing  boats,  talk  about  registering  any  boat  that’s  got 
fishing  gear  on  it,  and  talking  about  requiring  any  boat,  from  any 
nation,  that  goes  to  shore  and  unloads  fish,  to  record  what  they’ve 
caught,  and  where  they  caught  it.  Unless  we  do  that,  we’re  going 
to  lose  our  migratory  fish  that  we  have  done  so  much  to  protect— 
and I hope that you will join us on that. 

Secretary GUTIERREZ. Yes, sir. 
Senator STEVENS. I may submit some other questions. I’ve taken 

more than my time. I thank you very much. 

The CHAIRMAN. Thank you. 
Senator Boxer? 
Senator BOXER. Thank you very much. 
Mr.  Secretary,  you  started  off,  you  were  saying  about  how  great 

the economy is, the deficit, and so on. What’s the deficit now? 

Secretary  GUTIERREZ.  We  measure  the  deficit  as  a  percent  of 

Senator BOXER. No, no, but what is the deficit now? 
Secretary GUTIERREZ. The deficit, in absolute dollars? 
Senator BOXER. Yes, absolute dollars. Someone in the Commerce 

Department, I’m sure, knows what the deficit it. 

Secretary  GUTIERREZ.  The—can  I  answer  the  way  we  think 

Senator BOXER. No, no, no, no. What is the deficit? 
Secretary GUTIERREZ. The deficit is 1.5 percent of GDP. 
Senator BOXER. OK. Could my staff calculate what that is? 
The CHAIRMAN. Sixty billion dollars. 
Senator BOXER. Sorry? 
The CHAIRMAN. Sixty billion dollars. 
Senator  BOXER.  It’s  bigger  than  $60  billion  a  year,  isn’t  it?  For 
the year. What is the deficit? I’m asking you to—I’ll wait—I would 
ask that you figure it out. 

Senator  STEVENS.  What  period  of  time?  You  mean  total  deficit? 
Secretary GUTIERREZ. We’ll give—— 

GDP. 

about—— 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  08:56 Sep 17, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00020 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\75785.TXT JACKIE

17 

Senator  BOXER.  I’m  talking  about  the  yearly  deficit  that  we  are 

running, based on the last completed year. 

Secretary GUTIERREZ. Give me a moment. 
Senator BOXER. What is the deficit? 
Secretary GUTIERREZ. See, the—Senator Boxer, we measure it as 

Senator BOXER. Can you just go to Google that, please? We’ll just 

a percent of GDP. 

go—— 

GDP. 

Secretary GUTIERREZ. 205—— 
Senator BOXER.—and Google. 
Secretary GUTIERREZ. 205 billion, if you want dollars. 
Senator BOXER. Thank—$205 billion. 
Secretary GUTIERREZ. But I believe it’s a trap, to look at dollars. 
Senator BOXER. I totally get it. 
Secretary GUTIERREZ. OK. 
Senator BOXER. It’s not my question. 
Secretary GUTIERREZ. Right, $205 billion. 
Senator  BOXER.  So,  the  deficit  is  $205  billion  now.  Now,  when 

the Bush Administration took over, what was the deficit? 

Secretary GUTIERREZ. The deficit climbed to about 4.1 percent of 

Senator BOXER. No, no. What was the yearly deficit? Isn’t it true 
there  was  a  surplus  of  $236  billion?  I’m  sorry,  Budget  Committee 
tells me $128 billion—— 

Secretary GUTIERREZ. Right. 
Senator  BOXER.—surplus.  OK.  So,  you  now  have  a  $205  billion 
deficit.  It  was  a  $128  billion  surplus.  So,  I  think,  when  you  talk 
about this, you should put it in context. Do you know what the debt 
is  now,  and  what  the  debt  was  when  the—when  you  took  over— 
when  the  Bush  Administration  took  over?  We  don’t  need  to  beat  a 
dead horse. Would you get me that information? 

Secretary GUTIERREZ. Yes. Sure. 
Senator BOXER. The fact is, we’ve been going in the wrong direc-
tion.  We’re  finally,  now,  wrapping  our  arms  around  this  with 
PAYGO  budgets  and  the  like.  But,  I  think,  when  you  started  off 
that way, it was a bit of a—— 

Secretary GUTIERREZ. Well—— 
Senator  BOXER.—shock  to  me,  because,  you  know,  after  all  the 
hard work that we went through in this body, on both sides of the 
aisle, to get rid of the deficit—remember, there was a time we had 
to  have  a  balanced  budget  amendment  to  the  Constitution,  and  a 
lot of us said, ‘‘We don’t need that, we just need to plain, straight- 
ahead, balance the budget.’’ So, when you started off with that, you 
kind  of  lost  me  from  the  start  on  the  macro  picture.  I  used  to  be 
a stockbroker, and, you know, I dealt with numbers a lot, and there 
are  very  many  ways  you  can  play  numbers,  but  my  people  back 
home want to know, do we have a deficit? Do we have a debt? And 
how  come  this  all  happened,  when  we  were  on  the  way  to  getting 
rid of the debt? 

Let  me  ask  you  a  question  about  the  oceans,  because  a  lot  of  us 
here  revere  them,  as  I  know  you  do,  and  they’re  so  important  in 
my State; they’re the essential beauty of the State, they’re also the 
essential  economic  engine  of  the  State,  our  coastline  is.  So,  I  want 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  08:56 Sep 17, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00021 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\75785.TXT JACKIE

18 

to ask you if you’ve looked at the U.S. Commission on Ocean Policy 
and the Pew Ocean Commissions Report. 

Secretary GUTIERREZ. Yes. 
Senator  BOXER.  And  my  understanding  is—and  tell  me  if  I’m 
right or wrong here—that you’re not supporting their recommenda-
tions, in terms of how to structure NOAA. Am I wrong on that? Is 
there hope that we can do something with those Commissions? 

Secretary GUTIERREZ. There were a number of recommendations. 
There  were  some  that  I—that  we  supported,  some  that  we  have 
some questions on. I’m not sure exactly which ones—— 

Senator  BOXER.  OK.  Well,  I  think  this  would  be  good,  if  you 
would do this for me in the next week, if you would have your staff 
analyze their recommendations and which ones you support. 

Because  I’m  working  with  Members  of  the  Committee  on  both 
sides to put forward some comprehensive ocean legislation, the Na-
tional  Ocean  Protection  Act,  and  I  would  love  to  know  if  there  are 
parts  of  that—those  reports  that  you  embrace;  then  we  can  at 
least—— 

Secretary GUTIERREZ. Sure. 
Senator BOXER.—get together on some of those areas. 
In terms of the climate—and I know Senator Stevens was getting 
at this with his questions on the satellites—could you tell us, over-
all, what level of funding we need over the next few years to main-
tain  and  develop  our  capacity  so  we’re  not  blinded  at  the  time  we 
need to see most? 

Secretary  GUTIERREZ.  Well,  let  me  just  say,  we  have  invested 
about  $37  billion—I  say  ‘‘we,’’  throughout  the  Administration—on 
climate  change,  about  $13  billion  on  science.  That  takes  us  out  to 
2012.  The  President  is  currently  leading  the  G8  to  develop  a  new 
global  plan,  which  will  lay  out  what  we  need.  But,  of  course,  what 
we need will be determined, in great part, by the goals we set. 

I will say this about climate change, Senator Boxer, that our cli-
mate  change  intensity—and  I  am  not  playing  with  numbers  here, 
this  is  just  the  way  we  believe  we  should  measure  it,  as  a  factor 
of GDP—has actually declined. We have outperformed Europe. The 
President  set  a  goal  to  reduce  climate—emissions  intensity  by  18 
percent  by  2012,  and  we  are  right  on  track  to  achieve  that  goal. 
Senator  BOXER.  Well,  sure,  that’s  not  a  very  good  goal,  18  per-
cent intensity. That’s—intensity is not the way we’re going to move 
in this Congress. But let me—because I know I’m taking too much 
time—I have one more question, if I might. 

The  GAO  has  disputed  the  Administration’s  figures  that  you’ve 

spent on global warming. So, I’d like to work with you—— 

Secretary GUTIERREZ. Sure. 
Senator  BOXER.—so  you  can  provide  us  with  a  detailed  break-
down of the figures that you’ve given us. I’ve heard some in the Ad-
ministration  say  $37  billion,  and  the  GAO  says  it’s  just  not  trans-
parent. So, if we could work together—and we’ll work staff-to-staff. 
But  I  know  you’re  proud  of  the  work  that  NOAA  scientist  Susan 
Solomon has done. She chaired the IPCC Working Group that con-
cluded  global  warming  is  unequivocal  and  a  90  percent  certainty 
that humans are causing global warming. So, based on that report 
and the work of other NOAA scientists, do you have any doubt that 
the humans—that humans are causing the Earth to warm? 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  08:56 Sep 17, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00022 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\75785.TXT JACKIE

19 

Secretary  GUTIERREZ.  I  think  there  is  general  scientific  con-
sensus  that  climate  change  is,  in  part,  caused  by  human  activity. 

Senator BOXER. ‘‘In part, caused,’’ do you know what part? 
Secretary  GUTIERREZ.  I  don’t  think  anyone  can  tell  you—or 

maybe they can, but I can’t tell you exactly what—— 

Senator BOXER. OK. 
Secretary  GUTIERREZ.—portion.  But  I  think  there  is  consensus 

that it is being caused by human activity. 

Senator  BOXER.  OK,  we’ll  put  in  the  record  the  IPCC—which 

says that ‘‘most of the warming.’’ 

Secretary GUTIERREZ. Yes, but—— 
Senator  BOXER.  They’ve  concluded  that  most  of  the  warming— 

not part of the warming, but most of the warming—— 

Well,  thank  you  very  much,  sir,  and  I’ll  look  forward  to  working 

with you on some of these issues. 

Secretary GUTIERREZ. Senator Boxer, may I make just one—— 
Senator BOXER. If the Chairman will allow—— 
Secretary GUTIERREZ.—comment? 
Senator BOXER.—of course. 
Secretary  GUTIERREZ.  Just  one  piece  of  data.  That  deficit  that  I 
mentioned,  the  1.5—our  average  over  the  last  40  years  is  2.1.  So, 
I  think  there’s  a  lot  to  be  proud  of  when  we  think  about  our  econ-
omy. 

Thank you, Chairman. 
Senator STEVENS. Mr. Chairman, I’d like to put in the record the 
findings  of  the  International  Arctic  Research  Center  from  Alaska 
concerning  the  contribution  of  humans  and  the  change  to  what’s— 
what we’re seeing, in terms of warming. 

The CHAIRMAN. It will be done. 
[The information referred to follows:] 

IS THE EARTH STILL RECOVERING FROM THE ‘‘LITTLE ICE AGE’’? 

A Possible Cause of Global Warming—an Updated Version 

of the International Arctic Research Center of the University of Alaska Fairbanks 

by Syun-Ichi Akasofu, Ph.D., Founding Director 

There  seems  to  be  a  roughly  linear  increase  of  the  temperature  of  about  0.5  °C/ 
100  years  (∼1  °F/100  years)  from  about  1800,  or  even  much  earlier,  to  the  present. 
This  value  may  be  compared  with  what  the  IPCC  scientists  consider  the  manmade 
effect  of  0.6–0.7  °C/100  years.  This  linear  warming  trend  is  likely  to  be  a  natural 
change.  One  possible  cause  of  the  linear  increase  may  be  that  the  Earth  is  still  re-
covering from the Little Ice Age. This trend should be subtracted from the tempera-
ture  data  during  the  last  100  years  in  estimating  the  manmade  effect.  Thus,  there 
is a possibility that only a fraction of the present warming trend may be attributed 
to the greenhouse effect resulting from human activities. This conclusion is contrary 
to the IPCC (2007) Report (p. 10), which states that ‘‘most’’ of the present warming 
is due to the greenhouse effect. It is urgent that natural changes be correctly identi-
fied  and  removed  accurately  from  the  presently  on-going  changes  in  order  to  find 
the contribution of the greenhouse effect. 

There  are  many  documents  that  suggest  that  the  period  between  1500  and  1900 
was relatively cool; the River Thames was frequently frozen in the later part of the 
17th century (Lamb, 1982). Stories of the exploration of the Northwest Passage also 
hint that sea ice conditions in northern Canada in the latter part of the 1800s were 
much  worse  than  conditions  today;  it  is  now  possible  to  cruise  the  passage  without 
much assistance by icebreakers. Although there is some doubt about the exact tim-
ing  of  the  ‘‘Little  Ice  Age,’’  it  is  possible  to  infer  that  the  period  between  1500  and 
1900  was  relatively  cool  in  many  parts  of  the  world  (cf.  Lamb,  1982;  Gribbin  (ed.), 
1978; Crowley and North, 1991; Burroughs, 2001; Serreze and Barry, 2005). 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  08:56 Sep 17, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00023 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\75785.TXT JACKIE

20 

Climate change during the last 100 years or so has been intensely discussed over 
the  last  few  decades.  However,  it  is  important  to  recognize  that  as  far  as  the  basic 
global warming data for this period are concerned, all we have is what is illustrated 
in the top of the diagram of Figure 1. The IPCC Reports state that the global aver-
age  temperature  increased  about  0.6  °C–0.7  °C  (∼1  °F)  during  the  last  100  years. 
Their interpretation may be illustrated in the middle graph of Figure 1, as both the 
temperature  and  the  amount  of  CO2 in  the  air  have  increased  during  the  last  100 
years or so. Further, it is well known that CO2 causes the greenhouse effect, so that 
it  is  natural  to  hypothesize  that  CO2 is  one  of  the  causes  of  the  present  warming 
trend.  Nevertheless,  it  is  not  appropriate  to  tacitly  assume  that  the  0.6  °C–0.7  °C 
rise is mostly due to the manmade effect without carefully examining the contribu-
tions of natural changes. 

Indeed,  there  is  so  far  no  definitive  proof  that  ‘‘most’’  of  the  present  warming  is 
due  to  the  greenhouse  effect,  as  is  stated  in  the  recently  published  IPCC  Report 
(2007). In fact, the relationship between air temperature and CO2 is not simple. For 
example,  the  temperature  had  a  cooling  trend  from  1940  to  about  1975,  in  spite  of 
the  fact  that  atmospheric  CO2 began  to  increase  rapidly  in  about  1940,  as  can  be 
seen in Figures 1 and 2. It is not possible to determine the percentage contribution 
of the greenhouse effect that is a direct result of human activities, unless (and until) 
natural  causes  can  be  identified  and  subtracted  from  the  present  warming  trend. 

Figure 1: The top graph is the basic data on global warming; the middle graph is the IPCC’s 
interpretation  that  the  0.6  °C  (or  1  °F)  increase  is  caused  by  the  greenhouse  effect;  the  bottom 
graph is another interpretation, suggesting that a large fraction of the 0.6 °C–0.7 °C rise is due 
to natural changes. 

As  another  interpretation,  in  the  bottom  graph  of  Figure  1,  it  is  assumed  that 
there was an almost linear increase of natural temperature rise of 0.5 °C/100 years, 
which  is  superposed  by  fluctuations,  such  as  multi-decadal  oscillations.  The  dif-
ference  between  the  second  and  third  diagrams  is  that  the  IPCC  Report  assumes 
that the warming trend is mostly due to human activities, while the latter assumes 
that a large fraction of the warming trend is due to natural causes. Actually, there 
are  many  other  ways  to  interpret  the  temperature  changes  than  what  is  shown  in 
the bottom graph of Figure 1. 

It  is  somewhat  surprising  that  there  has,  so  far,  been  no  debate  on  such,  and 
many other interpretation and possibilities. Indeed, it is doubtful that the IPCC con-
clusion  of  ‘‘most’’  is  the  consensus  of  2,500  experts  in  climatology.  The  greenhouse 
effect  is  a  hypothesis  to  be  proven.  At  this  stage  in  the  development  of  modeling 
and  simulation,  however,  one  can  test  the  hypothesis  only  qualitatively,  not  quan-
titatively by global climate models (GCMs), because they are adjusted or ‘‘tuned’’ to 
reproduce the 0.6 °C–0.7 °C rise. This point will be discussed later. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  08:56 Sep 17, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00024 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\75785.TXT JACKIE

s
p
e
.
1
N
U
Y
S
1
0
8

21 

Figure  2  shows  both  the  global  average  temperature  and  the  temperature  from 
stations widely distributed along the coast of the Arctic Ocean (blue) during the last 
100 years or so (Polyakov et al., 2002). One can see that the magnitude of tempera-
ture changes is significantly larger in the Arctic. A similar result was shown in the 
ACIA  Report  (2004);  see  p.  23.  In  particular,  fluctuations,  including  multi-decadal 
oscillations, are greatly ‘‘amplified’’ in the Arctic. There occurred two major fluctua-
tions, one between 1920 and 1975, and one after 1975. The arctic data indicates that 
the two fluctuations in the global average data should not be ignored as minor fluc-
tuations. 

Indeed,  it  is  crucial  to  investigate  the  nature  of  the  temperature  rise  between 
1920–1940  and  the  one  after  1975.  As  the  Figure  1  (top  graph)  and  Figure  2  show, 
CO2 in the atmosphere began to increase rapidly after 1940, when the temperature 
decreased  from  1940  to  1975.  Thus,  the  large  fluctuation  between  1920  and  1975 
can be considered to be a natural change, until proven otherwise. Therefore, unless 
the  difference  between  the  two  changes  can  be  understood,  it  is  not  possible  to  say 
tacitly  that  the  rise  after  1975  is  mostly  caused  by  the  greenhouse  effect.  There  is 
nothing wrong to suspect that the rise after 1975 contains a significant natural com-
ponent. 

Figure  2:  Red—global  average  change  (IPCC  Reports).  Blue—data  from  stations  along  the 
coastline of the Arctic Ocean (Polyakov et al., 2002). The figure shows also the amount of various 
sources of energy used during the last century; gas, oil, and coal all release CO2. 

In  this  note,  we  examine  first  the  possibility  of  the  case  shown  in  the  bottom 

graph of Figure 1 and then the nature of the fluctuations. 
1. Linear Increase 

The  basis  for  drawing  a  linear  line  in  the  bottom  graph  in  Figure  1  cannot  be 
justified  without  additional  data.  Fortunately,  Fritzsche  et  al.,  (2006)  obtained  ice 
cores  from  Severnaya  Zemlya,  an  island  in  the  Arctic  Ocean,  and  made  the  δ18O 
analysis.  Their  results  are  reproduced  here  as  Figure  3a.  It  shows  the  δ18O  data 
at  the  top.  It  is  possible  to  observe  that  an  almost  linear  change  is  evident  from 
about 1800 to the present in the ice core record; the red linear line is added by the 
present  author;  large  fluctuations  are  also  indicated  as  ‘‘natural  changes’’  also  by 
the author, since it is unlikely that CO2 caused any major temperature fluctuations 
before 1940. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  08:56 Sep 17, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00025 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\75785.TXT JACKIE

s
p
e
.
2
N
U
Y
S
1
0
8

22 

Figure  3a:  Late  Halocene  ice  core  record  from  Akademii  Nauk  Ice  Cap,  Severnaya  Zemlya, 
Russian Arctic, together with temperature records at Vardo, Norway, and along the arctic coast 
stations  (Polyakov  et  al.,  2002),  the  last  one  is  the  same  as  the  blue  curve  in  Figure  2  (D. 
Fritzsche et al., 2006). 

Their  figure  shows  also  a  thermometer  record  from  Vardo  in  Northern  Norway. 
The bottom graph is the same as the ‘‘Arctic’’ one of Figure 2. The credibility of the 
ice  core  record  is  supported  by  the  similarity  with  the  Norwegian  temperature 
record and the data by Polyakov et al., (2002), or vice versa. 

Figure  3b  shows  ice  core  data  from  Quelccaya,  Peru,  and  Dunde,  China,  com-
paring them with decadal temperature departures in the Northern Hemisphere. One 
can infer a quasi-linear trend in both data, in addition to various fluctuating compo-
nents. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  08:56 Sep 17, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00026 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\75785.TXT JACKIE

s
p
e
.
3
N
U
Y
S
1
0
8

23 

Figure  3b:  Decadal  temperature  departures  (from  1881–1975)  in  the  Northern  Hemisphere 
from 1580 A.D. to 1975 (second) compared with decadal average δ18O values for both the Dunde, 
China,  D–1  core  (top)  and  Quelccaya,  Peru,  ice  cores  (third  and  fourth).  The  dashed  line  is  the 
1881–1980 A.D. mean for the δ18O records (L.G. Thompson, 1992). 

The  ACIA  Report  (2004)  took  the  average  of  100-year  records  as  the  baseline 
(their figure on page 23), namely, a line parallel to the horizontal axis, with the av-
erage  value  as  the  zero  (base)  line.  However,  the  above  ice-core  records  show  that 
such a practice is not appropriate. There is clearly a linear increase of temperature 
from  about  1800  or  much  earlier.  Similar  linear  trends  can  be  inferred  in  the  Nor-
wegian data and the data by Polyakov et al., (2002) in Figure 3a. There are several 
other  supporting  studies  that  suggest  that  there  has  been  a  linear  change  from 
about 1800 or earlier. For example, Figures 4, 5, 6, 7, and 8 suggest a roughly linear 
change  of  temperature  from  the  earliest  recordings  by  Burroughs  (2001),  Tarand 
and  Nordli  (2001),  and  van  Egelen  et  al.,  (2001).  The  trend  lines  and  curves  were 
drawn by the quoted authors, not by the present author. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  08:56 Sep 17, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00027 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\75785.TXT JACKIE

s
p
e
.
4
N
U
Y
S
1
0
8

24 

Figure 4: The linear trends for the temperature of central England over the period 1660–1996 
for  (a)  the  annual  data,  and  (b)  the  winter  months  (December  to  February),  show  a  marked 
warming. In both cases, this warming is significant, but although the temperature rise is great-
er in winter, this trend is less significant because the variance from year to year is correspond-
ingly greater (L.D. Burroughs, 2001). 

Figure  5:  Temperature  change  at  a  number  of  stations  in  the  world  (P.D.  Jones  and  R.S. 

Braley, 1992). 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  08:56 Sep 17, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00028 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\75785.TXT JACKIE

s
p
e

.

6
N
U
Y
S
1
0
8

s
p
e
.
5
N
U
Y
S
1
0
8

25 

Figure  6:  Winter  temperature  (December–March)  at  Tallinn  since  1500,  which  are  based  on 
ice  break-up  dates  in  Tallinn  port.  The  series  is  smoothed  by  Gaussian  filters  of  3,  9,  and  30 
years as standard deviations in the Gaussian distribution (A.N. Tarand and P.;. Nordli, 2001). 

Figure 7: Summer temperature (April to July) for Tallinn, which is based on ice break-up and 
rye  harvest  data  and  of  instrumental  observations.  To  ease  the  study  of  variations  on  a 
timescale  of  approximately  30  hours,  the  observations  are  smoothed  by  a  Gaussian  filter  with 
standard  deviation  of  9  years  in  its  distribution  (curve).  A  trend  line  for  the  whole  period  is 
also shown (A.N. Tarand and P.;. Nordli, 2001). 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  08:56 Sep 17, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00029 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\75785.TXT JACKIE

s
p
e

.

8
N
U
Y
S
1
0
8

s
p
e
.
7
N
U
Y
S
1
0
8

26 

Figure 8: 25-year mean winter (DJF) temperature at De Bilt (A.F.V. van Engelen, J. Buisman 

and F. Ijnsen, 2001). This figure includes a longer period data than Figures 4, 5, and 6. 

There  is  further  supporting  evidence  of  a  continuous  climate  change  from  about 
1800.  Figure  9a  shows  that  the  southern  edge  of  sea  ice  in  the  Norwegian  Sea  has 
been continuously receding from about 1800 to the present. Further, there is a pos-
sibility  that  the  present  receding  is  related  to  an  intense  inflow  of  warm  North  At-
lantic water (Polyakov et al., 2002); this phenomenon is known as the North Atlan-
tic Oscillation (NAO), which is a natural phenomenon (Figure 9b). Further, Figures 
10a  and  10b  show  examples  of  glaciers  in  Alaska  and  New  Zealand,  respectively, 
which  have  been  receding  from  the  time  of  the  earliest  records.  There  are  a  large 
number  of  similar  records  from  the  European  Alps  and  elsewhere  (Grove,  1988). 
Therefore, it can be assumed that many glaciers advanced during the Little Ice Age 
and  have  been  receding  since  then.  Thus,  the  retreat  is  not  something  that  began 
only in recent years. 

Figure  9a:  Upper,  retreat  of  sea  ice  in  the  Norwegian  Sea  (T.  Vinje,  2001).  Lower,  satellite 

data corresponding to the period between 1970 and 1998 are shown. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  08:56 Sep 17, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00030 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\75785.TXT JACKIE

s
p
e

.

0
1
N
U
Y
S
1
0
8

s
p
e
.
9
N
U
Y
S
1
0
8

27 

Figure 9b: Inflow of warm North Atlantic water into the Arctic Ocean (I. Polyakov, 2006). 

Figure 10a: Retreat of glaciers in Glacier Bay (Alaska Geographic, 1993). 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  08:56 Sep 17, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00031 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\75785.TXT JACKIE

s
p
e

.

2
1
N
U
Y
S
1
0
8

s
p
e
.

1
1
N
U
Y
S
1
0
8

28 

Figure 10b: Retreat of the Franz Josef Glacier in New Zealand (J.M. Grove, 1988); the coloring 

is added by the present author for emphasis. 

Figure 11: Ice core temperature at the GISP–2 site in Greenland (R.B. Alley, 2000). 
The  fact  that  an  almost  linear  change  has  been  progressing,  without  a  distinct 
change  of  slope,  from  as  early  as  1800  or  even  earlier  (about  1660,  even  before  the 
Industrial  Revolution),  suggests  that  the  linear  change  is  a  natural  change.  As 
shown at the top graph of Figure 1 and also Figure 2, a rapid increase of CO2 began 
only after 1940. 
As  far  as  the  gradient  of  the  linear  change  is  concerned,  it  can  roughly  be  esti-
mated  to  be  about  0.5  °C/100  years  based  on  Figures  3a,  3b,  4,  5,  6,  and  7.  It  is 
very interesting to recognize that this gradient is almost comparable with the IPCC’s 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  08:56 Sep 17, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00032 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\75785.TXT JACKIE

s
p
e

.

4
1
N
U
Y
S
1
0
8

s
p
e
.

3
1
N
U
Y
S
1
0
8

29 

estimate  of  0.6  °C–0.7  °C/100  years.  Since  the  maximum  decrease  of  temperature 
during  the  Little  Ice  Age  is  estimated  to  be  about  0.5  °C  (Wilson  et  al.,  2000)—1.5 
°C  (Crowley  and  North,  1991;  Grove,  2005),  it  is  worthwhile  to  speculate  that  the 
Earth is still recovering from it. Another possibility is that the Earth is experiencing 
a  new  warming  trend  of  unknown  causes.  Yet,  another  possible  additional  cause 
may be changes in solar output (cf. Soon, 2005; Scafetta and West, 2006), which we 
did not investigate in this note. 

Therefore,  the  linear  change,  which  is  likely  to  be  a  natural  change,  should  be 
subtracted  from  the  top  graph  of  Figure  1  in  order  to  identify  and  estimate  the 
greenhouse effect. 

However,  it  is  not  intended  here  to  make  an  accurate  estimate  of  the  gradient  of 
the  linear  change.  It  is  beyond  the  scope  of  this  note.  It  is  a  task  of  climatologists. 
There  is  a  great  uncertainty  in  obtaining  early  data  corresponding  to  the  accuracy 
of  the  top  graph  of  Figure  1  in  terms  of  the  geographic  distribution  of  the  stations, 
seasons, etc. Here, I emphasize only that a significant part of the 0.6 °C–0.7 °C in-
crease during the last 100 years includes natural changes, contrary to the statement 
by the IPCC Report (2007), so that natural changes must be subtracted before esti-
mating manmade effects. 

At  this  point,  we  encounter  one  of  the  fundamental  problems  in  climatology  and 
also meteorology. Is there any definitive evidence to conclude that the Little Ice Age 
ended by 1900? Permafrost that formed during the Little Ice Age still exists around 
Fairbanks,  although  it  is  thawing  (Romanovsky,  2006).  More  fundamentally,  how 
can  we  determine  the  ‘‘normal’’  or  ‘‘standard’’  temperature  from  which  deviations 
(warming  or  cooling)  are  considered  to  be  abnormal?  At  this  time,  there  is  no  ref-
erence level to conclude that the Little Ice Age was over by about 1900. The problem 
is  that  the  ‘‘normal’’  and  ‘‘standard’’  depend  on  the  chosen  period  and  the  length  of 
the  period.  Figure  11  shows  the  ice  core  temperature  at  the  GISP–2  site  in  Green-
land (Allen, 2000). One can recognize at least that the Earth experienced a cool pe-
riod  during  the  last  few  hundred  years.  Furthermore,  there  were  large  fluctuations 
of  temperature  in  the  past,  which  are  obviously  natural  changes,  so  that  there  is 
a  possibility  that  the  Earth  is  experiencing  a  new  warming  trend  after  recovering 
from the Little Ice Age. 

Further, the IPCC Report (2007) states that the present high temperature is ‘‘un-
usual’’ except for about 130,000 years ago (p. 10). However, if we examine the tem-
peratures  during  all  the  other  interglacial  periods  (240,000,  330,000,  400,000  years 
ago),  each  interglacial  period  was  warmer  than  the  present  one.  Thus,  it  could  be 
said  that  the  present  interglacial  period  was  abnormally  a  cool  one.  In  fact,  even 
during the present interglacial period, the temperature was a little warmer than the 
present  one  for  a  few  thousand  years  at  its  beginning  (cf.  Wilson  et  al.,  2000).  It 
seems  that  there  are  unjustifiable  efforts  on  the  part  of  IPCC  to  stress  that  the 
present warming is very unusual. 
2. How Linear is the Linear Change? 

It  is  reasonable  to  expect  that  the  linear  change  is  only  a  rough  first  approxima-
tion. An accurate examination is expected to show deviations from the linear trend, 
if  the  greenhouse  effect  is  significant,  namely  an  upward  deviation  from  the  linear 
change  after  1940.  As  mentioned  earlier,  this  is  a  task  of  climatologists.  This  may 
be  hard  to  examine  because  the  linear  change  is  superposed  by  large  fluctuations. 
In  this  respect,  it  is  interesting  to  note  a  recent  study  of  sea  level  changes 
(Holgate,  2007);  it  is  shown  in  Figure  12.  Although  the  data  covers  only  the  period 
after  1907,  it  is  sufficient  to  examine  any  indication  of  accelerated  increase  of  sea 
level after 1940. The sea level change should reflect the expected changes associated 
with the thermal expansion of seawater and glacier melting changes during the last 
half  century  that  were  warned  in  the  IPCC  Reports.  Figure  12  shows  that  there  is 
no  clear  indication  of  an  accelerated  increase  of  sea  level  after  1940,  even  if  some 
individual  glaciers  in  the  world  show  accelerated  receding.  In  fact,  comparing  the 
slope between 1907–1960 and 1960–2000, there is even slightly less increase in the 
latter  period.  During  the  period  of  his  study,  Holgate  (2007)  noted  that  the  rate  of 
sea level rise was about 1.7 mm/year. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  08:56 Sep 17, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00033 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\75785.TXT JACKIE

30 

Figure  12:  The  mean  sea  level  record  from  the  nine  tide  gauges  over  the  period  1904–2003 
based  on  the  decadal  trend  values  for  1907–1999.  The  sea  level  curve  here  is  the  integral  of 
the rates (Holgate, 2007). 
3. Fluctuations 

As  shown  in  Figure  2,  two  prominent  fluctuations  occurred  during  the  last  100 
years.  The  first  one  was  a  temperature  rise  from  1920  to  1940  and  the  subsequent 
decrease  from  1940  to  about  1975  (Figures  1  and  2).  The  second  one  is  the  present 
rise  after  1975.  As  stated  earlier,  it  is  crucial  to  examine  if  both  rises  are  due  to 
the  same,  similar,  or  entirely  different  causes.  Until  some  study  can  provide  con-
vincing  results  on  this  problem,  we  should  not  claim  that  the  rise  after  1975  is 
mostly due to the greenhouse effect as the IPCC Report did. 

It  is  interesting  to  note  from  the  original  paper  from  Jones  (1988,  1994)  that  the 
first  temperature  change  from  1920  to  1975  occurred  only  in  the  Northern  Hemi-
sphere.  Further,  it  occurred  in  high  latitudes  above  50°  in  latitude  (Serreze  and 
Francis,  2006).  The  present  rise  after  1975  is  also  confined  to  the  Northern  Hemi-
sphere,  and  is  not  apparent  in  the  Southern  Hemisphere;  there  may  be  a  problem 
due  to  the  lack  of  stations  in  the  Southern  Hemisphere,  but  the  Antarctic  shows  a 
cooling trend during 1986–2005 (Figure 13). 

Thus,  it  is  not  accurate  to  claim  that  the  two  changes  are  a  truly  global  phe-
nomenon,  even  if  averaging  the  data  from  both  hemispheres  can  provide  Figure  1. 
Since  the  greenhouse  effect  is  supposed  to  be  global,  the  two  prominent  changes 
(1920–40  and  after  1975)  may  be  considered  to  be  regional  changes.  Thus,  there  is 
a  possibility  that  both  increases  are  natural  changes,  unless  it  can  be  shown  defi-
nitely that such regional changes are caused by the greenhouse effect. Further, the 
two  changes  are  not  obvious  in  the  Southern  Hemisphere  (Jones,  1988).  If  this 
would  indeed  be  the  case,  it  may  not  be  very  difficult,  after  all,  to  remove  the  two 
prominent fluctuations from the changes during the last 100 years. Using data from 
stations below 50° latitude, fluctuations above and below the linear change can also 
be regarded as natural changes, as a very rough first approximation. One important 
question  is  how  much  of  the  rise  after  1975  is  ‘‘contaminated’’  by  natural  changes. 
It is important to note that the present global warming after 1975 is not uniform 
over the Earth. Although a single number, namely +0.6 °C–0.7 °C/100 years, is used 
in discussing global warming, the geographic distribution of ‘‘warming’’ is quite com-
plex. The upper part of Figure 13 shows the ‘‘warming’’ pattern during the last half 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  08:56 Sep 17, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00034 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\75785.TXT JACKIE

s
p
e
.

5
1
N
U
Y
S
1
0
8

31 

of  the  last  century,  from  about  1950  to  about  2000  (Hansen  et  al.,  2005).  One  can 
see that the most prominent change occurred in Siberia, Alaska, and Canada, name-
ly in the continental arctic. There is no doubt that such a prominent change contrib-
uted to the global average change in Figures 1 and 2. In the continental arctic, the 
warming  rate  was  several  times  more  than  the  global  average  of  0.6  °C/100  years 
(0.6  °C/2=0.3  °C/50  years).  It  may  be  also  noted  that  cooling  was  in  progress  in 
Greenland over the same time period. 

It  is  of  great  interest  to  ask  if  GCMs  can  reproduce  this  geographic  distribution 
of  the  observed  changes  shown  in  the  upper  part  of  Figure  13,  since  they  ‘‘can’’  re-
produce  the  0.6  °C–0.7  °C/100  years  rise.  Thus,  we  asked  the  IPCC  arctic  group 
(consisting of 14 sub-groups headed by V. Kattsov) to ‘‘hindcast’’ geographic distribu-
tion  of  the  temperature  change  during  the  last  half  of  the  last  century.  To 
‘‘hindcast’’ means to ask whether a model can produce results that match the known 
observations  of  the  past;  if  a  model  can  do  this  at  least  qualitatively,  we  can  be 
much  more  confident  that  the  model  is  reliable  for  predicting  future  conditions. 
Their  results  are  compiled  by  Bill  Chapman,  of  the  University  of  Illinois,  and  are 
shown  in  the  right  side  of  Figure  14a.  The  left  side  of  the  figure  is  taken  from  the 
ACIA Report (2004), which shows a similar trend as that of the upper part of Figure 
13,  namely  the  prominent  warming  in  the  continental  arctic  and  cooling  in  Green-
land. This comparison was undertaken in an attempt to reduce differences between 
them, because both are expected to be similar, but imperfect. 

Figure 13: Upper—the geographic distribution of temperature change between 1950 and 1998 
(Hansen  et  al.,  2005).  Lower—the  geographic  distribution  of  temperature  change  between  1986 
and 2005 (Hansen, 2006). 

We  were  surprised  at  the  difference  between  the  two  diagrams  in  Figure  14a.  If 
both were reasonably accurate, they should look alike. Ideally, the pattern of change 
modeled by the GCMs should be identical or very similar to the pattern seen in the 
measured  data.  We  assumed  that  the  present  GCMs  would  reproduce  the  observed 
pattern  with  at  least  reasonable  fidelity.  However,  we  found  that  there  was  no  re-
semblance at all, even qualitatively. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  08:56 Sep 17, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00035 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\75785.TXT JACKIE

s
p
e
.

6
1
N
U
Y
S
1
0
8

32 

Figure 14a: Comparison of the observed distribution of temperature changes (ACIA, 2004) and 

the simulation (hindcasting) by the IPCC arctic group (Chapman 2005). 

Our  first  reaction  to  this  surprising  result  was  that  GCMs  are  still  not  advanced 
enough  for  hindcasting.  However,  this  possibility  is  inconceivable,  because  the  in-
crease of CO2 measured in the past is correctly used in the hindcasting, and every-
thing we know is included in the computation. The IPCC arctic group’s result is the 
best result based on our present knowledge. In fact, they can reproduce the 0.6 °C– 
0.7  °C  increase  during  the  last  hundred  years.  If  the  greenhouse  effect  caused  the 
warming,  it  should  be  reproducible  to  some  extent  by  these  models,  even  if  the  re-
production is not perfect. 

It took a week or so before we began to realize another possibility of this discrep-
ancy:  If  14  GCMs  cannot  reproduce  prominent  warming  in  the  continental  arctic, 
perhaps  much  of  this  warming  is  not  caused  by  the  greenhouse  effect  at  all.  That 
is to say, because it is not caused by the greenhouse effect, the warming of the conti-
nental  arctic  cannot  be  reproduced  at  least  qualitatively  by  our  GCMs.  How  do  we 
examine that possibility? 

If the prominent warming in the continental arctic (Figure 13, upper, and Figure 
14a, left) is due to the greenhouse effect, the prominent trend should continue after 
2000.  That  is,  we  should  observe  an  amplification  of  continental  arctic  warming  in 
this century that will be even greater than the amplification that was observed dur-
ing  the  last  half  of  the  last  century,  because  the  amount  of  CO2 continues  to  in-
crease  at  an  exponential  rate.  Thus,  we  examined  the  warming  trend  during  just 
the  last  20  years  or  so,  provided  by  Hansen  (2006).  To  our  surprise,  the  prominent 
continental  arctic  warming  almost  disappeared  in  those  results;  the  Arctic  warmed 
at  a  rate  about  like  that  of  the  rest  of  the  world,  while  Greenland  showed  a  strong 
warming (the lower part of Figure 13), instead of cooling during the last half of the 
last century. Actually, in Fairbanks, the temperature shows a cooling trend between 
1977 and 2001, as can be seen in Figure 14b (Hartman and Wendler, 2005). There-
fore,  our  conclusion  at  the  present  time  is  that  much  of  the  prominent  continental 
arctic  warming  and  cooling  in  Greenland  during  the  last  half  of  the  last  century  is 
due to natural changes, perhaps to multi-decadal oscillations like Arctic Oscillation, 
the Pacific Decadal Oscillation, and the El Nin˜ o. This trend is shown schematically 
in the bottom graph of Figure 1 as positive and negative fluctuations. If this would 
indeed be the case, the IPCC Report is incorrect again in stating that the warming 
after 1975 is particularly caused by the greenhouse effect. If the fluctuation are only 
of  positive  changes,  the  linear  slope  in  the  third  graph  may  be  about  0.4  °C/100 
years. Again, this is a task of climatologists to clarify. 

In  this  connection,  it  might  be  added  that  permafrost  temperatures  have  stopped 
rising during the last several years (Richter-Menge et al., 2006); see Figure 15. The 
amount  of  CH4 has  ceased  to  increase  from  about  2000.  It  is  puzzling  why  they  do 
not show an accelerated increase if their increase before 2000 was due to the green-
house effect; they may be temporal fluctuations. 
4. Summary 

From  the  data  provided  in  the  earlier  sections,  it  is  quite  obvious  that  the  tem-
perature  change  during  the  last  100  years  or  so  includes  significant  natural 
changes, both the linear change and fluctuations. It is very puzzling that the IPCC 
Reports states that it is mostly due to the greenhouse effect. Further, unfortunately, 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  08:56 Sep 17, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00036 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\75785.TXT JACKIE

s
p
e
.

7
1
N
U
Y
S
1
0
8

33 

computers  are  already  incorrectly  ‘‘taught’’  or  ‘‘tuned’’  that  the  0.6  °C–0.7  °C/100 
years rise during the last hundred years is caused by the greenhouse effect, so that 
their  results  cannot  be  used  as  proof  of  the  greenhouse  effect  and  thus  cannot  pre-
dict accurately the degree of future warming. 

It is suggested here that the linear change may be due to the fact that the Earth 

is slowly recovering from the Little Ice Age or in the period of a new warming. 

Regardless  of  the  cause  of  the  Little  Ice  Age,  it  is  urgent  that  natural  changes 
should  be  correctly  identified  and  removed  accurately  from  the  present  on-going 
changes  in  order  to  find  the  contribution  of  the  greenhouse  effect.  Only  then  will 
an accurate prediction of future temperature changes become possible. 

One  lesson  here  is  that  it  is  not  possible  to  study  climate  change  without  long- 
term  data.  This  is  understandable  from  the  fact  that  it  is  not  possible  to  draw  the 
linear  line  in  the  bottom  graph  of  Figure  1  without  the  data  shown  in  Figures  3a, 
3b, 4, 5, 6, 7, and 8. 

It  is  very  easy  to  discredit  the  results  of  the  traditional  climate  change  studies 
(Figures 4, 5, 6, 7, and 8) in terms of accuracy. However, this is what climatologists 
must face. In some sense, inaccurate data (compared with modern data) during the 
last  few  hundred  years  are  more  important  than  accurate  satellite  data  after  1970 
in  our  study  of  global  warming.  Unfortunately,  at  this  time,  many  studies  are  fo-
cused only on climate change after 1975, because satellite data have become so read-
ily available. A study of climate change based on satellite data is a sort of ‘‘instant’’ 
climatology.  It  is  puzzling  why  the  causes  of  the  rise  between  1930  and  1940  have 
not  been  studied.  Chylek  et  al.,  (2006)  reported  that  present  changes  of  the  Green-
land ice sheet is less than what was observed during the 1920–1940 period. 

Figure  14b  shows  the  transition  from  the  declining  period  (1940–1975)  to  the  rising  period 
after  1975.  The  transition  is  a  step-function-like  change,  unlike  the  Greenland  effect.  Further, 
after  a  step-function-like  increase,  the  trend  appears  to  be  negative,  which  is  inconsistent  with 
what Figure 13 shows (B. Hartmann and G. Wendler, 2005). 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  08:56 Sep 17, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00037 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\75785.TXT JACKIE

s
p
e
.

8
1
N
U
Y
S
1
0
8

34 

Figure  15:  Permafrost  temperature  variations  in  Northern  Alaska  from  1976  to  2006.  Note 
that  the  increasing  temperature  from  about  1988  stopped  in  about  2000  (Richter-Menge  et  al., 
2006). 
5. Conclusion 

I would like to emphasize: 

(i)  Natural  components  are  important  and  significant,  so  that  they  should  not 
be ignored; 
(ii)  Two  natural  changes  are  identified  in  this  note:  a  linear  increase  of  about 
+0.5 °C/100 years and fluctuations superposed on the linear change; 
(iii)  It  is  insufficient  to  study  climate  change  based  on  data  from  the  last  100 
years; 
(iv)  It  is  difficult  to  conclude  about  causes  of  the  rise  after  1975  until  we  can 
understand the rise from 1920 to 1940; 
(v) Because of these deficiencies, the present GCM models cannot prove that the 
present  warming  (0.6  °C–0.7  °C/100  years)  is  caused  by  the  greenhouse  effect; 
and thus, 
(vi) Future prediction of warming by GCMs is uncertain. 

If  most  of  the  present  rise  is  caused  by  the  recovery  from  the  Little  Ice  Age  (a 
natural  component)  and  if  the  recovery  rate  does  not  change  during  the  next  100 
years,  the  rise  expected  from  the  year  2000  to  2100  would  be  0.5 °C.  Multi-decadal 
changes  would  be  either  positive  or  negative  in  2100.  This  rough  estimate  is  based 
on the recovery rate of 0.5 °C/100 years during the last few hundred years. It should 
be  noted  that  the  greenhouse  effect  shown  by  GCMs  should  be  carefully  re-evalu-
ated,  if  the  present  rise  (0.6  °C–0.7  °C/100  years)  is  mostly  due  to  natural  compo-
nents, such as those I suggest. 
References: 

ACIA (Arctic Climate Impact Assessment), Cambridge University Press, 2005. 
Alaska Geographic, Glaciers of Alaska, vol. 28, No. 2, 1993. 
Alley,  R.B.,  The  Younger  Dryas  cold  interval  as  viewed  from  central  Greenland, 

Quaternary Science Reviews, 19, 213–226, 2000. 

Burroughs, W.J., Climate Change, Cambridge Univ. Press, 2001. 
Chylek,  P.,  N.K.  Dubey,  and  G.  Lesins,  Greenland  warming  of  1920–1930  and 

1995–2005, Geophys. Res. Lett., 33, L11707, 2006. 

Chapman, W., private communication, 2005. 
Crowley, T.J. and G.R. North, Paleoclimatology, Oxford Univ. Press, 1991. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  08:56 Sep 17, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00038 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\75785.TXT JACKIE

s
p
e
.

9
1
N
U
Y
S
1
0
8

35 

Fritzsche,  D.,  R.  Schutte,  H.  Meyer,  H.  Miller,  F.  Wilhelms,  T.  Opel,  L.M. 
Savatyugin, Late Holocene ice core record from Akasemii Nauk Ice Cap, Severnaya 
Zemlya,  J.W.  Dowdeswell  and  I.C.  Willis,  eds.,  Annals  of  Glaciology,  No.  42,  A150, 
2006. 

Gribbin, J. (ed.), Climate Change, Cambridge Univ. Press, 1978. 
Grove, J.M., Little Ice Age, in Encyclopedia of the Arctic (p. 477), Routledge, 2005. 
Grove, J.M., The Little Ice Ages, Methuen, 1988. 
Hansen,  J.,  L.  Nazarenko,  Reto  Ruedy,  Makiko  Sato,  Josh  Willis,  Anthony  Del 
Genio,  Dorothy  Koch,  Andrew  Lacis,  Ken  Lo,  Surabi  Menon,  Tica  Novakov,  Judith 
Perlwitz, Gary Russell, Gavin A. Schmidt, and Nicholas Tausnev, Earth’s energy im-
balance: Confirmation and implications, Science, 308, no. 5727, pp 1431–1435, 2005. 

Hansen, J., Private communication, 2006. 
Hartmann,  B.  and  G.  Wendler,  The  significance  of  the  1976  Pacific  climate  shift 

in the climatology of Alaska, J. Climate, 18, 4824, 2005. 

Holgate,  S.J.  On  the  decadal  rates  of  sea  level  change  during  the  twentieth  cen-

tury, Geophys. Res. Lett., 34, L01602, 2007. 

IPCC (Intergovernmental Panel on Climate Change), http://www.ipcc.ch. 
Jones,  P.D.,  Hemisphere  surface  air  temperature  variations:  a  reanalysis  and  an 

update to 1993, J. Climate, 1, 1794, 1994. 

update to 1987, J. Climate, 1, 654, 1988. 

Jones,  P.D.,  Hemispheric  surface  air  temperature  variations:  recent  trends  and 

Jones,  P.D.  and  R.S.  Bradley,  Climatic  variations  in  the  longest  instrumental 
records,  in:  Climate  Since  A.D.  1500  (eds.  R.S.  Bradley  and  P.D.  Jones),  pp.  246– 
268, Routledge, London, 1992. 

Lamb, H.H., Climate, history and the modern world, Methuen, 1982. 
Polyakov,  I.V.,  Genrikh  V.  Alekseev,  Roman  V.  Bekryaev,  Uma  Bhatt,  Roger  L. 
Colony, Mark A. Johnson, Varerii P. Karklin, Alexander P. Makshtas, David Walsh, 
and Alexander V. Yulin, Observationally based assessment of polar amplification of 
global warming, Geophys. Res. Lett., 29, No. 18, 1878, 2002. 

Polyakov, I, private communication, 2006. 
Richter-Menge,  J.,  J.  Overland,  A.  Proshutinsky,  V.  Romanovsky,  J.C.  Gascard, 
M.  Karcher,  J.  Maslanik,  D.  Perovich,  A.  Shiklomanov,  and  D.  Walker,  Arctic  Re-
port, pp. S46–S52, K.A. Shein (ed), in State of the Climate in 2005, NOAA/NESDIS/ 
NCDC and American Meteorological Society Report, BAMS, 2006. 

Romanovsky, private communication, 2006. 
Scafetta,  N.  and  B.J.  West,  Phenomenological  solar  signature  in  400  years  of  re-
constructed  Northern  Hemisphere  temperature  record,  Geophys.  Res.  Lett.,  33, 
L1778, 2006. 

Serreze, M. and J.A. Francis, The arctic amplification debate, Climate Change, 76, 

241, 2006. 

2005. 

Serreze, M.C. and R.G. Barry, The Arctic Climate System, Cambridge Univ. Press, 

Soon,  W.W.-H.,  Variable  solar  irradiance  as  a  plausible  agent  for  multidecadal 
variations  in  the  Arctic-wide  surface  air  temperature  record  of  the  past  130  years, 
Geophys. Res. Lett., 32, L16712, doi:10.1029/2005GL023429, 2005. 

Thompson, L.G., Ice core evidence from Peru and China, Climate since A.D. 1500, 

R.S. Bradley and P.D. Hones, Routledge, 1992. 

Tarand,  A.  and  P.;.  Nordli,  The  Tallinn  temperature  series  reconstructed  back 

half a millennium by use of proxy data, Climate Change, 48, 189, 2001. 

van  Engelen,  A.F.V.,  J.  Buisman,  and  F.  Ijnsen,  History  and  Climate—Memories 
of  the  Future,  A  millennium  of  weather,  winds,  and  water  in  the  lower  countries, 
Kluwer Academic Press, New York, Boston, London, 2001. 

Vinje,  T.,  Anomalies  and  Trends  of  Sea-Ice  Extent  and  Atmospheric  Circulation 

in the Nordic Seas during the Period 1864–1998, J. Climate, 14, 255–267, 2001. 

Wilson,  R.C.L.,  S.A.  Drury,  and  J.L.  Chapman,  The  Great  Ice  Age,  Routledge, 

2000. 
For Further Reading: 

Group, 2000. 

Cruikshank, J., Do Glaciers Listen?, University of Washington Press, 2005. 
Fagan, B., The Little Ice Age: How climate made history, 1300–1850, Persus Books 

Jones,  P.D.,  A.E.J.  Ogilvie,  T.D.  Davies,  and  K.R.  Britta,  History  and  Climate: 

Memories of the Future?, Kluwer Academic/Plenum Pub., 2001. 

Jones, P.D., Early European instrumental records, History and Climate; Memories 

of the Future?, Kluwer Academic Plenum Pub., pg. 55, 2001. 

Ogilvie,  A.E.  and  T.  Jo`nsson,  The  Iceberg  in  the  Mist:  Northern  Research  in  Pur-

suit of a ‘‘Little Ice Age,’’ Kluwer Academic, 2001. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  08:56 Sep 17, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00039 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\75785.TXT JACKIE

36 

The CHAIRMAN. Senator Klobuchar? She’s not here? OK. 
Senator McCaskill? 

STATEMENT OF HON. CLAIRE MCCASKILL, 

U.S. SENATOR FROM MISSOURI 
Senator MCCASKILL. Thank you, Mr. Chairman. 
I’m concerned about the fact that you don’t have an IG. Have you 
sent  a  letter  to  the  President  requesting  that  an  IG  be  appointed 
immediately? 

Secretary  GUTIERREZ.  We  have—yes,  we  have  started  that  proc-
ess.  We’re  going  through  that  process.  I  have  met  a  couple  of  can-
didates, yes. Yes. I am very concerned, as well. 

Senator  MCCASKILL.  Are  you  aware  that  the  Deputy  IG  that  is 
there, there are allegations that he was also involved in the retalia-
tion that was—that became such a controversy? In fact, really, your 
IG  department  has  been  a  source  of  a  management  problem,  I 
would assume, for you, for some period of time now. 

Secretary GUTIERREZ. I’m aware of the problems in the IG office, 
and we are paying very close attention, because of the politics and 
the  tension  and  the  human  interaction  that  takes  place  in  a  place 
like  that,  where  you  have  those  sort  of  problems.  So,  yes,  this  is 
a big priority for us. 

Senator  MCCASKILL.  Well,  I  would  appreciate  being  in  the  loop 
on the progress that you’re making there. I think it’s essential that 
you  have  a  full-time  IG  onboard  as  quickly  as  possible.  And  I 
know—I’m  just  reviewing  some  of  the  reports  that  have  been 
made—that you have to realize the importance of that, in terms of 
you being able to do your job effectively. 

I also would ask that you would consider—I have legislation that 
would mandate this, but this ought to be something we—shouldn’t 
have to mandate—that you would put—the IG’s link on your home 
page. I think any citizen who goes to an agency of the Federal Gov-
ernment ought to be able to immediately find the reports that have 
been  done—that  are  expensive  to  do,  take  a  lot  of  man  hours  to 
do—they  ought  to  be  easily  accessible  to  the  public.  And  I  would 
appreciate your consideration of putting the IG’s link on your home 
page. 

As  we  talk  about  the  IG,  and  looking  at  some  of  the  IG  reports 
that Mr. Frazier did, and understanding that he left under a cloud, 
but  some  of  his  work  remains,  I’m  curious  about  one  that  caught 
my  eye.  And  I  know  this  is  like,  kind  of,  majoring  in  the  minors, 
but  it’s  one  of  those  things  where  perception  is  very  important.  In 
2002, he had a finding about the inability of the Commerce Depart-
ment to monitor first-class plane travel. Do you have the ability to 
communicate with all of your employees by e-mail? 

Secretary GUTIERREZ. Yes. 
Senator  MCCASKILL.  Would  you  mind,  in  the  next  week,  putting 
out  an  e-mail  that  no  one  in  Commerce  should  be  taking  a  first- 
class  plane  flight  unless  the  limited  exceptions  under  the  Federal 
travel regulations are observed? Because there was a finding, back 
in  2002,  that  there  were  a  lot  of  premium  air  flights  taking  place, 
and  that  there—and  there’s  all  this  ‘‘rah,  rah,  rah,’’  around  about, 
‘‘Well,  these  forms  weren’t  there,  and  these  forms  weren’t  there.’’ 
I mean, this is pretty simple. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  08:56 Sep 17, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00040 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\75785.TXT JACKIE

37 

Secretary GUTIERREZ. No, I—— 
Senator  MCCASKILL.  You  know,  Government  should  not  be  pay-
ing for first-class plane tickets for people who work for the Govern-
ment, except under limited circumstances—— 

Secretary GUTIERREZ. I believe—— 
Senator MCCASKILL.—where there’s not a coach-class flight avail-
able,  where  it’s  more  than  14  hours,  or  where  there’s  a  disability. 
This  is  not  rocket  science.  And  you’ve  got  a  lot  of  stuff  you’ve  got 
to manage that is close to rocket science. 

Secretary GUTIERREZ. I’ve—— 
Senator  MCCASKILL.  This,  to  me,  seems  pretty  simple  and 

straightforward. 

Secretary GUTIERREZ. I—— 
Senator MCCASKILL. Would you mind doing that—— 
Secretary GUTIERREZ. I will—— 
Senator MCCASKILL.—putting out an e-mail from—— 
Secretary  GUTIERREZ.—do  that,  and  I  will  see  if  we’ve  had  any 

problems recently. 

Senator  MCCASKILL.  Well,  it’s  in  the  report,  from  March  2007— 
management  challenges  for  the  Department,  that,  in  2002,  they 
found  that  the  guidelines  weren’t  being  followed,  and  they  went 
back  to  check,  and  it’s  no  better.  So,  this  is  a  good  example  of— 
well,  I  shouldn’t  say  ‘‘it’s  no  better,’’  but  the  problem  still  exists. 
They did a sample of 74 travel, and found out there was only three 
that  it  was  documented  that  it  was  under  appropriate  cir-
cumstances that first-class travel was taken. 

I  mean,  I  know  it  may  be  shooting  fish  in  a  barrel,  but,  to  me, 

it’s—— 

Secretary GUTIERREZ. No, I agree. I agree. 
Senator  MCCASKILL.—it’s  something  that  the  people  don’t  ‘‘get,’’ 
and,  frankly,  I  don’t  ‘‘get.’’  And  if  you  would  fix  that  simple  prob-
lem, I would greatly appreciate it. 

Secretary GUTIERREZ. I think it’s a fair point, and I can tell you, 
I  have  forgotten  what  it’s  like  to  travel  first  class,  so  if  somebody 
else is traveling first class, I’d like to know about it. 

Senator MCCASKILL. I think they are. Thank you, Mr. Secretary. 
Thank you, Mr. Chairman. 
The CHAIRMAN. Thank you. 
Senator Klobuchar? 

STATEMENT OF HON. AMY KLOBUCHAR, 

U.S. SENATOR FROM MINNESOTA 
Senator KLOBUCHAR. Thank you, Mr. Chairman. 
Mr.  Secretary,  I  would—I  wanted  to  go  through  some  of  these 
issues  that  we’ve  been  talking  about  in  our  hearings.  We’ve  had 
some great hearings in the Commerce Committee over the last few 
months,  and  one  of  them  you’ve  touched  on,  which  is  competitive-
ness.  And  we  had  a  number  of  the  Nobel  Prize  winners  from  the 
United States here, and they talked about their concerns about in-
novation  and  about  research.  And  they  talked  about  how  we  had 
these  great  laboratories  that  used  to  be  supported  by  AT&T  and 
General Electric, IBM, and that these laboratories really no longer 
exist,  and  the  funding  has  been  so  depleted  that  we  really  don’t 
have the research powerhouses that we once had, and, at the same 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  08:56 Sep 17, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00041 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\75785.TXT JACKIE

38 

time, we’re competing on the world stage with other countries that 
are  putting  more  money  into  their  research.  Do  you  believe  that 
the  government-supported  laboratories  we  have  now,  like  the  Na-
tional  Institute  of  Standards  and  Technology  laboratories,  can 
serve as a replacement? And do you think we need to do more? 

Secretary  GUTIERREZ.  Well,  that’s  a  great  question,  I  appreciate 
that.  Under  the  President’s  American  Competitiveness  Initiative, 
we  have  requested  $136  billion  over  10  years  for  research,  pri-
marily  in  the  Department  of  Energy,  NIST,  and  the  National 
Science Foundation. 

I believe we have a system that works, and the system is not just 
the  U.S.  Government  system,  because  we  do  about  a  third  of  all 
R&D  in  the  country.  What  we  tend  to  do  is  mostly  research,  and 
the  private  sector  does  the  development.  I  think  what  makes  our 
system  so  effective  is  that  the  research  that  the  Government  does 
works very much hand-in-hand with the development that the pri-
vate  sector  does,  and  some  of  the  research  and  development  that 
takes place in universities. So, I think it’s a very good system, but, 
as you know, the world is getting more competitive—we need to en-
sure that our system is always getting better. 

Senator  KLOBUCHAR.  All  right.  And—I’d  refer  you  to  the  testi-
mony  we  had  from  those  Nobel  Prize  winners,  just  because  they 
were  concerned,  and  not  only  about  the  research,  but  also  about 
the  education  levels.  Of  course,  we’ve  just  passed  the  America 
COMPETES Act, and are—— 
Secretary GUTIERREZ. Right. 
Senator KLOBUCHAR.—trying to focus more on math and science. 
But I think it’s something, when you look at the number of degrees 
coming  out  of  other  countries,  that  we  should  be  watching  out  for. 
And  then,  along  that—the  issue  of  research.  And  I  know  that 
Senator  Boxer  brought  up  the  climate  change  issue.  And  this  hap-
pened  before  my  time  in  the  Senate,  but  I  was  always  very  con-
cerned—I  know  I  had  been  asked  about  it,  talking  about  the 
issue—it  was  back  in—I  think  it  was  around  the  spring  of  2006, 
when some of the NOAA scientists described repeated instances in 
which  the  Administration  had  played  down  the  threat  of  climate 
change in their documents and news releases. Can you comment on 
these  concerns?  And  have  you  talked  to  these  scientists?  Just  be-
cause  we’re  entering—the  rest  of  the  year,  here,  where  I  think 
we’re  going  to  be  passing—and  I  hope  we’re  going  to  be  passing— 
some  significant  climate  change  legislation,  and  I’ve  been  con-
cerned  about  those  scientists  being  muzzled,  and  wondered  what 
the  follow  up  is  from,  what  I  have  here,  the  April  6,  2006,  Wash-
ington  Post  article,  where  employees  had  talked  about  being  chas-
tised  for  speaking  on  policy  questions,  removal  of  references  to 
global warming from reports, and other things. 

Secretary  GUTIERREZ.  We  have  a—if  I  may,  Senator,  we  have  a 
policy that allows scientists to communicate research—scientific re-
search.  We  encourage  them  to  use  the  help  of  a  public  affairs  ex-
pert, but it is not required. Where we do require public affairs over-
sight  is  when  it’s  a  policy  question—not  a  scientific  question,  but 
a  policy  question.  If  there  is  a  disagreement  on  that,  the  scientist 
has  the  ability  to  appeal.  So,  we  have  a  pretty  progressive  policy. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  08:56 Sep 17, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00042 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\75785.TXT JACKIE

39 

There have been instances where we’re putting together a packet 
of  information,  and  there  is  a  disagreement  as  to  what  should  go 
into  the  packet  of  information.  But  that  should  not  be  taken  as  a 
sign  that  we  are  preventing  the  scientists  from  communicating. 
They  have  the  ability,  the  right,  to  go  out  and  communicate  sci-
entific research as often as they want, and we’re very proud of the 
fact  that  that’s  the  way  we  operate.  That  is  a  new  policy,  because 
it hadn’t been updated since the 1980s. But that’s the policy today 
in the—— 

Senator  KLOBUCHAR.  So,  a  new  policy  went  into  place  after  this 

came out in—— 

Secretary  GUTIERREZ.  We—yes,  we  reviewed  the  policy.  And  we 

realized that our policy needed to be updated. 

Senator KLOBUCHAR. OK. 
Secretary GUTIERREZ. Yes. 
Senator KLOBUCHAR. On a very different topic, and something we 
just  discussed  last  week—this  will  be  my  last  questions  here—the 
concern that I have with this—the digital TV transition. And what 
we learned at this hearing was that in Great Britain 80 percent of 
the  consumers  know  that  their  DTV  transition  is  going  to  be 
phased  in  between  2008  and  2012,  but  in  this  country,  all  these 
polls, despite some efforts and, I think, some very minimal funding, 
the knowledge of this is much lower. And I have hundreds of thou-
sands  of  families  in  Minnesota,  as  Senator  McCaskill  has  in  Mis-
souri,  who  are  suddenly  going  to  find  out  that  their  over-the-air 
analog TVs aren’t working. And I think Senator Cantwell described 
it  as  a  train  wreck  waiting  to  happen.  And  I’d  like  to  know  what 
lessons  we  can  learn  from  what  they’re  doing  right  in  Great  Brit-
ain,  and  what  we’re  doing  wrong,  and  how  we’re  going  to  fix  this. 
Secretary  GUTIERREZ.  Senator,  this  is  one  of  those  plans  where, 
if  it’s  not  managed  correctly,  it  can  have  problems,  but  it  is  the 
type of project that should be, and can be, managed adequately. We 
have a date of February 17, 2009, for the actual transition. So, we 
work back from that. We actually have flow charts that work back 
from  that.  When  are  the  coupons  supposed  to  arrive?  When  are 
consumers  supposed  to  know  that  this  is  going  to  happen?  How 
much money do we need to spend? Where do we need to—— 

Senator KLOBUCHAR. But isn’t it just, like—— 
Secretary GUTIERREZ.—spend it? 
Senator KLOBUCHAR.—$5 million that has been—— 
Secretary GUTIERREZ. Well—— 
Senator KLOBUCHAR.—set aside? 
Secretary GUTIERREZ.—we have—we have a $5 million budget for 
public  education,  but  we  also  have  commitments  from  networks, 
from  private-sector  companies,  from  retailers,  from  manufacturers 
who  will  benefit  from  this.  So,  the  amount  of  air  time  and  media 
presence will be a lot more than $5 million. But we can lay out the 
full plan for you—when the coupons drop, when they expire, when 
people  are  supposed  to  know—because  this  can  be  managed  well, 
and it should be managed well. 

Senator  KLOBUCHAR.  OK.  Well,  I  appreciate  that,  but  I  just 
wanted you to know there were a number of Senators on this Com-
mittee that are concerned that that be managed well—— 

Secretary GUTIERREZ. Yes. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  08:56 Sep 17, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00043 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\75785.TXT JACKIE

40 

Senator  KLOBUCHAR.—and  that  we  don’t  have  consumers  that 
suddenly  have  no  TV,  and  maybe  aren’t  the  ones  that  can  afford 
to buy a new one. 

Secretary GUTIERREZ. Thank you. 
Senator KLOBUCHAR. Thank you. 
The CHAIRMAN. Senator Smith? 

STATEMENT OF HON. GORDON H. SMITH, 

U.S. SENATOR FROM OREGON 

Senator SMITH. Thank you, Mr. Chairman. 
And,  Mr.  Secretary,  thank  you  for  being  here.  I  want  to,  for  the 
record,  note  what  a  terrific  job  you  did  in  your  Department  in  re-
sponding to the crisis of fishermen along the Oregon coast. You had 
the  right  people  there  to  help.  You’ve  helped  us  to  come  up  with 
the  resources  to  see  them  through.  You  were  willing  to  declare  a 
fishing  disaster,  which  triggered  those  funds.  And  I  know  my  last 
trip  down  to  the  south  coast,  there  were  many  expressions  of  ap-
preciation  for  your  Department  and  specific  personnel,  and  I  want 
the public to know that you were there, and you made a difference 
in  a  way  that  is  helping  to  preserve  very  vulnerable  jobs  in  an  es-
sential industry in this country. And I certainly appreciate it. 

Mr.  Secretary,  as  we  speak  of  the  whole  Klamath  Basin,  that, 
certainly,  these  fishermen  were  a  part  of  it,  the  status  of  fisheries 
in the Klamath Basin continues to be a concern, not just last year, 
but  there  are  intermingled  interests  between  fishermen,  farmers 
and Indian tribes. And there is a revised model to predict returning 
adult  salmon  to  the  Klamath  River  Basin.  I’m  wondering,  is  it 
proving to be accurate? Is it an accurate tool for salmon managers, 
or does it need any further revision? 

Secretary  GUTIERREZ.  I’ll  have  to  get  up  to  speed  on  the  actual 
method.  My  understanding  is  that  the  numbers  look  a  lot  better, 
that there is improvement. If you’d like, we can go back and double 
check and make sure that the methodology is right. 

Senator  SMITH.  I  think  that’s  important.  You  know,  so  often  in 
the media this is depicted as fishermen versus farmers versus Na-
tive Americans. All of these groups recognize a community of inter-
est.  And  I  think  we’ve  learned  an  awful  lot  about  how  to  manage 
the  water  flows  and  what  a—sometimes  what  helps  the  suckerfish 
hurts the salmon. 

Secretary GUTIERREZ. Right. 
Senator  SMITH.  And  it  is  more  the  timing  of  releases  of  water. 
But  I  just  want  to  state,  for  the  record,  that,  as  people  pick  over 
past decisions, it is my view that whenever any government policy 
cuts off, 100 percent, Native Americans, fishermen, or farmers, that 
policy,  by  its  nature  is  extreme  and  wrong.  It  is  our  obligation  to 
try to mesh these interests, sometimes in conflict, but they need to 
be  made  simpatico  so  that  each  can  survive  with  a  limited  re-
source. 

Recently,  a  court  ruling  overturned  the  biological  opinion  for 
threatened  coho  salmon  in  the  Klamath  River.  There  are  a  lot  of 
coho  salmon  in  the  Klamath  River,  and  that’s  why  there  was  an 
effort not to list them. I’m wondering, How does NOAA fisheries in-
tend  to  proceed  with  reconsultation,  as  it  relates  to  coho,  to  meet 
the Federal court injunction—overturning? 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  08:56 Sep 17, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00044 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\75785.TXT JACKIE

41 

Secretary GUTIERREZ. Senator, I will have to get back to you—— 
Senator SMITH. OK. 
Secretary GUTIERREZ.—on that specific point. 
Senator  SMITH.  I  appreciate  that.  The  thing  I’m  interested  in  is 
whether the reconsultation will be completed before the start of the 
2008  irrigation  system—season,  rather—because  it  affects  a  lot  of 
folks who I care deeply about. 

Sea lion predation in the Columbia River is also a huge concern, 
if  you’re  interested  in  salmon  recovery.  Sea  lions  in  the  Columbia 
River  killed  over  4  percent  of  this  year’s  spring  salmon  run.  This 
is  the  highest  number  ever,  since  we’ve  started  counting  sea  lion 
predation. The states of Oregon, Washington, and Idaho have filed 
for authority to use more effective means of controlling problem sea 
lions. And I wonder if you’re satisfied with the current tools, or do 
you  think  these  states  have  a  right  to  say  we’ve  got  to  do  some-
thing more if we’re serious about saving salmon? 

Secretary  GUTIERREZ.  I  think  the  whole  goal  of—on  one  hand, 
ending  overfishing,  complementing  that  with  a  sound  aquaculture 
plan,  and  then,  on  top  of  that,  doing  anything  we  can  to  ensure 
that we’re maximizing other ways in which we’re dealing with los-
ing our fish population, we can always improve. And if we’re losing 
more  salmon  because  of  that,  that’s  something  we  should  be  fo-
cused on. 

Senator SMITH. Well, Mr. Secretary, I would just hope you would 
give  serious  consideration  to  the  requests  of  these  three  northwest 
States  who  are  much  encumbered  by  the  management  efforts,  cur-
rently,  which  are,  I  think,  doing  inadequately,  to  deal  with  the 
issue  of  sea  lions.  I  don’t  know  if  you’ve  ever  witnessed  it  person-
ally, but when these runs return, you see hundreds of sea lions lit-
erally chewing the center out of a salmon and throwing it up. And 
it’s not a few, it’s in the thousands of salmon that are being killed 
in front of your eyes. And yet, we don’t run the hydroelectric dams, 
we  don’t  allow  a  whole  lot  of  other  human  activities,  but  we  allow 
this  sea  lion  population  to  grow  unmitigated,  at  least  sufficiently. 
And  so,  it  is  very  discouraging  to  local  folks,  and  I  hope  we  have 
some  other  tools  in  place  before  next  year’s  salmon  run,  because 
we’re at cross-purposes with our own interests here. And the num-
bers  of  sea  lions  are  out  of  balance,  in  terms  of  our  desire  to  save 
salmon. And it is truly something that needs our attention if we’re 
serious  about  what  we  say,  and  that  is,  we  want  to  save  salmon 
runs. 

I’ve  previously  raised  concerns  about  the  import  monitoring  pro-
gram  on  textile  and  apparel  from  Vietnam.  Currently,  most  of  the 
products  subject  to  the  monitoring  are  not  produced  here  in  the 
United  States.  I’m  wondering,  What  steps  has  the  Department 
taken  to  identify  which  products  are,  in  fact,  produced  domesti-
cally?  And  when  will  the  Department  end  the  unnecessary  uncer-
tainty  created  by  the  monitoring  and  reduce  the  scope  of  moni-
toring to match domestic production? 

Secretary  GUTIERREZ.  As  you  know,  we  put  the  monitoring  sys-
tem  in  place  as  a  result  of  a  request  from  industry.  We  have  not 
yet  had  to  trigger  any  duties  or  quotas,  because  of  the  monitoring 
system.  I  believe  it’s  working  quite  well.  The  Vietnamese,  as  you 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  08:56 Sep 17, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00045 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\75785.TXT JACKIE

42 

know, were very disappointed. And this was not something that we 
had bargained on, but—— 

Senator SMITH. Yes. 
Secretary GUTIERREZ.—in the end, we said we have to do this for 
our industry. So, I think we’re all pleased with the way the system 
is  working.  At  one  point,  we  thought  it  was  getting  to  the  stage 
where  we’d  have  to  trigger  it.  We’re  giving  it  another  couple  of 
weeks.  But  as  we  look  at  this  I  hear  these  numbers,  probably  on 
a biweekly basis, so we’re very much on top of this. 

Senator SMITH. Well, I appreciate that, and I hope you’ll stay on 
top  of  it,  because  I  know  you’re  trying  to  do  a  balancing  act  here. 
On  the  one  hand,  you  have  American  manufacturers  who  want  to 
stop  things  from  Vietnam  from  coming  in;  on  the  other  hand,  you 
have  American  brands—Nike,  Columbia  Sportswear,  Adidas,  you 
can  go  on  and  on  and  on—who  are  American  companies,  as  well, 
and  who  want  to  be  able  to  engage  in  American  commerce,  and 
they’re pitted against one another. And the uncertainty sometimes, 
with the monitoring system, creates—— 

Secretary GUTIERREZ. Yes. 
Senator SMITH.—difficulty in commerce. 
Secretary  GUTIERREZ.  Yes.  And  what  we’ve  tried  to  do,  Senator, 
is make the rules clear, so that the numbers drive the decision. But 
we will be all over it. Thank you. 

Senator  SMITH.  Mr.  Chairman,  do  I  have  any  more  time  to  ask 

one other question on broadcast spectrum? 

As  you  may  be  aware,  many  of  my  Committee  colleagues  and  I 
sent  a  letter  to  OMB,  urging  that  it  help  expedite  the  process  of 
relocating  incumbent  government  users  off  the  spectrum,  awarded 
in  the  AWS  auction,  by  issuing  a  statutorily-required  report  to 
Congress.  I’m  pleased  to  say  that  the  report  was  issued  and  the 
funds  have  been  transmitted.  Unfortunately,  not  much  has  hap-
pened  since  then,  that  I  can  determine.  And,  while  I  applaud  the 
NTIA  for  working  with  agencies  as  they  prepare  to  relocate,  I’m 
concerned  that  agencies  are  at  risk  of  missing  their  relocation 
deadlines. 

In  the  meantime,  this  spectrum  is  not  being  put  to  its  best  use, 
to deploy wireless broadband to residents in metropolitan and rural 
areas,  especially  in  Oregon.  There  are  120  AWS  licensees  who 
spent nearly $14 billion to use spectrum that government agencies 
now occupy. What can be done to expedite this? 

Secretary GUTIERREZ. Senator, we’re aware of your concern about 
the  time  that  it’s  taken  to  transfer  the  spectrum.  And  this  is  from 
the  2006  auction.  We  are  doing  everything  we  can  to  speed  up  the 
process,  because  we  know  every  day  that  goes  by  is  return  that 
isn’t  taking  place.  So,  we’re  aware  of  your  concern,  and  we  are 
doing  everything  we  can  to  speed  it  up  so  that  we  can  get  that 
spectrum transferred and get people using it for their business pur-
poses or whatever other purposes they need it. 

Senator SMITH. Great. And, finally, many of my constituents are 
very interested in the ongoing procurement of new fishery vessels— 
survey vessels. And I understand a fourth vessel is destined for the 
West  Coast,  where  it  will  support  critical  research  on  West  Coast 
marine  resources  and  ecosystems.  I  would  note  that  the  majority 
of  the  groundfish  resources  requiring  research  are  in  Oregon, 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  08:56 Sep 17, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00046 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\75785.TXT JACKIE

43 

Washington,  and  northern  California.  Can  you—maybe  not  now, 
but  can  you  provide  me  with  an  update  on  where  we  are  in  that 
procurement  process  of  this  vessel?  And  do  you  have  a  projected 
schedule  for  delivery  of  the  fourth  vessel?  And  have  you  begun 
looking at potential sites to homeport this fourth vessel? 

Secretary  GUTIERREZ.  Senator,  I’ll  be  glad  to  get  you  the  full 
schedule and update and the—sort of, the timetable for when we’ll 
have that. 

Senator SMITH. Thank you, Mr. Chairman. 
I—just a humorous question. At your confirmation hearing, I pre-
dicted  you  would,  at  the  end  of  this  term,  know  more  about  fish 
than cornflakes. I wonder if that’s true. 

Secretary GUTIERREZ. It’s getting close. It’s getting very close. 
[Laughter.] 
Secretary  GUTIERREZ.  I  never  had  the  thought  of  having  farm- 
raised  cornflakes,  so  I’m  actually  maybe  a  step  ahead  of  this  now. 

Senator SMITH. There you go. 
Secretary GUTIERREZ. Thank you, Senator. 
Senator SMITH. Thank you. 
The CHAIRMAN. Thank you very much. 
I  must  confess  my  ignorance  of  sea  lions  ravaging  salmon  runs. 
Senator SMITH. It—— 
The CHAIRMAN. What tools are now being employed? 
Senator  SMITH.  Well,  they  don’t  want  to  kill  them,  and  that’s 
what  I  am  indicating  here.  And  they  just  harass  them,  basically. 
They try to drive them off. It is dubious—in its effect. These popu-
lations  of  sea  lions,  because  of  the  Sea  Lion  Protection  Act,  which 
I’m  certainly  sympathetic  to  it,  I  don’t  like  to  see  any  animal 
killed—but  the  truth  of  the  matter  is,  we’re  spending  billions  of 
dollars  to  save  salmon,  and  this  Act  stands  juxtaposed  to  another 
species. And so, we’re at cross-purposes with our own policies. And 
so, we don’t want to kill sea lions, and the vision is, when you see 
in the Arctic when people would go up and club a sea lion, that lit-
tle pup. And they want their skins, but they don’t stay little pups, 
they turn into enormous mammals, and they eat tons of salmon on 
a  daily  basis.  That’s  their  preferred  food.  And  they  know  when 
they’re  coming  back  up  the  river.  And  they,  in  the  thousands,  will 
gather there eat these fish that have survived 4 years in the ocean, 
at  population  numbers  far  beyond  what  nature  ever  designed  for 
them  in  previous  times,  before  they  had  this  other  protection.  And 
so, we have two statutes at cross-purposes. And I’m simply making 
the  point  that  this  has  ramifications  all  up  and  down  a  basin  in 
the  Pacific  Northwest,  where,  on  the  one  hand,  you  have  this  pol-
icy;  on  the  other  hand,  you  have  that  policy.  But,  in  combination, 
these  policies  do  untold  damage  to  the  generation  of  hydroelectric 
power.  People  are  concerned  about  global  warming.  The  same  peo-
ple  that  are  concerned  about  global  warming  want  to  tear  out  hy-
droelectric dams. It makes no sense. 

It has a tremendous impact on farmers, to irrigate; has a tremen-
dous impact on fishermen who have made their livings for genera-
tions  as  salmon  fishermen;  and  yet,  we  have  these  two  statutes 
which  are  utterly  in  conflict,  and  I’m  afraid,  Mr.  Secretary,  a  har-
assment  policy  does  little  to  nothing  that  you  can  measure,  in 
terms  of  the  impact  on  saving  salmon.  And  I  just  think  we’ve  got 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  08:56 Sep 17, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00047 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\75785.TXT JACKIE

44 

to  decide  what  we  want.  The  problem  when  you  go  to  regulate  na-
ture is—it’s like a grabbing a balloon, you’ll grab it here, and you’ll 
blow it up out there. We’ve blown out a huge problem as it relates 
to sea lion populations when it comes to saving Pacific salmon. It’s 
a  problem.  And  we  need  more  tools.  I  don’t  want  to  kill  them,  but 
I don’t want them in the mouth of the Columbia, beyond what na-
ture intended them to be. 

The  CHAIRMAN.  I  just  learned  that  we  have  jurisdiction  over  sea 

Mr.  Secretary,  I  will  be  submitting  most  of  my  questions,  but 

there are some that are rather urgent. 

lions now. 

You know the digital transition comes up February 17, 2009. We 
had a hearing 2 weeks ago, at which time it was disclosed that, as 
one  of  the  Senators  indicated,  80  percent  of  United  Kingdom  citi-
zens  know  about  their  transition  program,  and  ours  was  about  10 
percent.  I  just  hope  that  at  the  time,  18  months  from  now,  we 
won’t  have  irate  citizens  calling  in  to  us,  because  they’re  going  to 
call  me,  not  you.  And  so,  I  hope  your  program  will  be  ready  for 
that. 

Secretary  GUTIERREZ.  Yes,  sir.  We  have  18  months  to  put  it  to-
gether,  and  we  have  not  started  the  awareness  program  yet  for 
people to know that this transition will take place. 

The CHAIRMAN. When will the program begin? 
Secretary GUTIERREZ. I believe our first wave of communications 

start toward the end of this year. 

The  CHAIRMAN.  About  6  months  ago,  we  began  seeing,  on  CNN 
and  other  TV  programs,  about  contaminated  pet  food.  Then  it  was 
followed  by  contaminated  toothpaste,  food.  Forty  percent  of  dump-
lings  coming  in,  filled  with  cardboard,  et  cetera,  et  cetera.  Two 
weeks  ago,  an  interagency  group  was  formed,  and  you  were  ap-
pointed  to  that  agency  to  oversee  the  protection  of  consumers. 
What can we expect from this agency? 

Secretary  GUTIERREZ.  Well,  the  President  has  given  the  working 
group  60  days  to  come  back  with  recommendations.  I  believe,  Mr. 
Chairman,  that  we  have  probably  the  safest  food  supply  in  the 
world, and the challenge is to keep it that way. And we know that, 
with  the  global  environment  changing,  and  we’re  importing  more, 
and  everyone  is  selling  more  to  everyone,  we  have  to  step  it  up  to 
ensure  that  we  continue  to  have  the  safest  food  supply  in  the 
world. 

Clearly,  the  Chinese  government  understands  that  this  is  prob-
ably  the  single  biggest  threat  to  their  economy  that  they  have,  be-
cause they can’t afford for the ‘‘Made in China’’ brand to be dimin-
ished  from  food  quality  problems.  So,  we’ll  be  developing  proce-
dures  here  in  the  U.S.,  recommendations  for  our  own  procedures. 
And  that  would  include  FDA,  USDA,  NOAA.  But,  for  the  Chinese, 
for  them  to  really  solve  this  problem—and  I  found  this  out  in  my 
old  career—quality  and  safety  have  to  be  manufactured  in.  If  you 
expect  to  inspect  them  in,  it’s  probably  a  little  bit  too  late.  So,  we 
will  continue  to  do  our  inspection,  we  will  continue  to  ensure  that 
what  comes  through  here—that  we  have  the  right  procedures.  But 
the  message  we’re  sending  to  them  is,  they’ve  got  to  get  their  act 
together inside; if not, they’re going to lose a lot of worldwide busi-
ness. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  08:56 Sep 17, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00048 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\75785.TXT JACKIE

45 

So, this is a top priority. Within 60 days, we should have a report 
to  the  President.  And,  in  that  report,  we’ll  make  recommendations 
for  our  own  internal  processes  and  recommendations  for  what  we 
should  do  to  audit  plants  in  China,  and  audit  processes  in  China, 
and  any  new  processes  that  we  would  recommend  for  our  compa-
nies to have in China. 

The  CHAIRMAN.  The  problem  is  a  huge  one,  when  you  consider 

that about 90 percent of all toys—— 

Secretary GUTIERREZ. Right. 
The  CHAIRMAN.—that  people  buy  here  come  from  outside,  about 
80  percent  of  the  fish  products  are  imported,  and  much  coming 
from China. 

Then  we  have  this  other  problem  of  piracy  and  counterfeiting, 
and  your  agency  plays  a  very  important  role  in  this.  And,  as  you 
know,  we  lose  billions  of  dollars  in  this  area.  Is  anything  being 
done now? 

Secretary  GUTIERREZ.  Just  to  give  you  a  sense  of  the  numbers, 
our  seizures  at  the  border  were  up  about  21  percent,  2006  versus 
2005,  and  it  continues  to  be  from  China.  So,  about  81  percent  of 
what we seize—and I—I’ve actually been to the warehouse, and it’s 
everything from watches to ties to running shoes. You name it, it’s 
counterfeit. So, the focus clearly is on China. 

We  have  done  a  couple  of  things  with  the  Chinese  government 
to  improve  that.  One  is,  we  do  have  law  enforcement  cooperation, 
so  that  our  law  enforcement  people  are  working  with  the  Chinese 
government  law  enforcement  people.  And  that  has  been  positive, 
because we’re sharing information, and we’re trying to get at these 
factories.  They  have  also  agreed  to  embed  software  in  any  new 
PCs,  because  one  of  the  big  problems  we  have  in  China  is  just 
counterfeit  software.  So,  now  any  personal  computer  bought  in 
China should have an embedded software. And what we’re hearing 
from  our  manufacturers,  that  they’re—that  is  being  reflected  in 
their sales. They’ve also put in place 50 different offices throughout 
the  country  to  monitor  this.  We  have  more  people  at  our  embassy. 
But, having said that, this is—you know, this is probably the sin-
gle biggest problem we face down the road—81 percent of what we 
seize,  from  China;  10  percent  of  the  world’s  medicines,  we  believe, 
are counterfeit. So, this is a priority today. I think the interagency 
process is working well, but we have to recognize that this is going 
to be a priority for the foreseeable future. And this is a huge threat 
to  our  brands,  because  our  economy  is  based  on  brands  and  copy-
rights  and  patents.  We  do  believe  that,  as  China  innovates  more, 
and  as  they  have  more  of  a  stake  in  intellectual  property,  that 
they’ll realize what a priority this is. 

In  the  meantime,  we  continue  to  do  the  law  enforcement  work. 
Every  time  we  meet  with  foreign  officials—and,  very  specifically, 
Chinese officials—the number-one item is IPR. So, this is a top, top 
priority,  because  this  is  big  for  our  economy.  This  can  hurt  our 
economy. And we’ve got to stop it before it becomes part of the nor-
mal course of doing business. 

The  CHAIRMAN.  Obviously,  the  budget  level  that  has  been  allo-
cated to your Department is too meager. And this Committee would 
like  to  assist  you  in  getting  better  resources,  because  most  of  the 
problems  that  we  see  today,  outside  of  the  war,  center  around  the 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  08:56 Sep 17, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00049 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\75785.TXT JACKIE

46 

activities  of  your  Department.  And  I  think  something  has  to  be 
done about providing you with better resources. 

Thank  you  very  much,  Mr.  Secretary,  and  I  will  be  submitting 

questions for your consideration in response. 

Secretary  GUTIERREZ.  Always  a  pleasure,  Mr.  Chairman.  Thank 

you very much. Thank you, Senator. 

The CHAIRMAN. Thank you. 
And the hearing is adjourned. 
[Whereupon, at 3:47 p.m., the hearing was adjourned.] 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  08:56 Sep 17, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00050 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\75785.TXT JACKIE

A P P E N D I X 

PREPARED STATEMENT OF HON. OLYMPIA J. SNOWE, U.S. SENATOR FROM MAINE 
Mr.  Chairman,  an  inscription  in  the  fac¸ade  of  the  Commerce  Department’s  head-
quarters  bears  the  following  words  of  nineteenth  century  historian  and  statesman 
George Bancroft: ‘‘Commerce defies every wind, outrides every tempest and invades 
every  zone.’’  It  is  to  ensure  that  the  department  is  appropriately  assisting—rather 
than  presumptively  steering—U.S.  businesses  to  navigate  through  increasingly 
treacherous  economic  waters  that  we  conduct  this  oversight  hearing.  I’d  therefore 
like  to  thank  you  and  the  Vice  Chairman  for  calling  this  critical  session,  and  wel-
come Secretary Gutierrez and thank him for his time and testimony. 

Mr. Secretary, on January 12, you and I stood in the Oval Office as the President 
signed  into  law  the  Magnuson-Stevens  Fishery  Conservation  and  Management  Re-
authorization  Act  of  2006.  The  Act  contains  numerous  provisions  that  will  improve 
management of our Nation’s fisheries, leading to greater economic stability for fish-
ermen and increased sustainability for our fish stocks. But in order for these provi-
sions to live up to their potential, they must be properly implemented. In particular, 
I am concerned that the National Marine Fisheries Service may not be interpreting 
a new provision on annual catch limits in a manner consistent with the underlying 
language of National Standard One requiring fishery management plans to achieve 
the  optimum  yield  on  a  continuing  basis.  Failure  to  adhere  to  this  standard  or  Na-
tional  Standard  Eight,  requiring  plans  to  minimize  socio-economic  impact,  will  fur-
ther devastate New England’s already ravaged groundfish industry, and I urge you 
to direct NMFS to act accordingly. 

In  my  home  state  of  Maine,  fisheries  are  vital  to  our  economy,  and  as  we  grow 
new  businesses,  one  of  the  industries  we  look  to  is  aquaculture.  Currently,  nearly 
150  aquaculture  facilities  in  Maine’s  state  waters  grow  Atlantic  salmon,  oysters, 
mussels,  and  other  commercially  valuable  seafood  worth  more  than  $80  million  an-
nually.  I  agree  with  the  administration’s  position  that  we  must  create  a  regulatory 
framework  to  permit  responsible,  environmentally  sensitive  aquaculture  develop-
ment  beyond  the  three-mile  boundary  of  state  waters.  The  world’s  remaining  wild 
fish  stocks  cannot  meet  the  growing  demand  for  seafood.  If  the  choice  is  importing 
aquacultured seafood from foreign countries like China which allow environmentally 
degrading  practices  and  poor  regulatory  oversight  of  antibiotics  and  additives, 
versus developing safe, environmentally neutral aquaculture facilities here at home, 
the decision is clear. 

Finally,  we  must  act  now  to  re-establish  our  Nation’s  network  of  environmental 
and  weather  monitoring  satellites.  The  next  generation  of  satellites  is  capable  of 
providing  forecasting  information  that  will  not  only  improve  our  Nation’s  weather 
and climate forecasting, but also accrue societal benefits in agriculture, energy, and 
the  mitigation  of  climate  change.  Unfortunately,  as  the  Administration  has  shifted 
NASA’s  attention  toward  manned  missions  to  Mars  and  beyond,  the  investment  in 
monitoring  developments  here  on  our  home  planet  has  suffered.  It  is  inappropriate 
to  direct  so  much  of  our  focus  and  resources  toward  understanding  other  worlds 
when  we  still  have  so  much  to  learn  about  the  one  that  sustains  us.  In  a  2007  re-
port,  the  National  Research  Council  of  the  National  Academies  stated  that,  ‘‘the 
United  States’  extraordinary  foundation  of  global  observations  is  at  great  risk’’  if 
present trends continue. Secretary Gutierrez, I look forward to hearing how you in-
tend to mitigate that risk. 

I  would  also  like  to  examine  the  role  the  Department  of  Commerce,  through  its 
International  Trade  Administration,  has  played  in  seeking  closer  trade  ties  to  a 
growing  number  of  nations  throughout  the  world.  In  its  march  to  lower  our  tariffs 
on imported goods, the department must be sure it is not selling our domestic busi-
nesses and their works short or—worse still—out. 

2006  saw  a  record  U.S.  trade  deficit  of  $764  billion  with  the  rest  of  the  world. 
This  includes  bilateral  imbalances  with  each  of  China,  the  European  Union  and 
Japan.  These  are  the  latest  figures  demonstrating  a  steady  slide  of  U.S.  producers’ 
market share in both the domestic and global markets. 

(47) 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  08:56 Sep 17, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00051 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\75785.TXT JACKIE

48 

One of the most troubling consequence of the decline of America’s production base 
is  the  dramatic  reduction  in  the  number  of  manufacturing  jobs  in  recent  years. 
Since 2000, America has lost approximately 3 million, or 17 percent, of its manufac-
turing jobs. Maine has lost over 21,000 jobs in that period, representing over 26 per-
cent of our manufacturing workforce! Nearly nine thousand of those loses were due 
to unfair competition from China, which turns a blind eye to its producers’ rampant 
theft  of  intellectual  property,  exploitation  of  labor,  degradation  of  the  environment 
and noncompliance with basic health and safety standards. 

In  a  further  outrageous  irony,  U.S.  service  professionals—which  form  the  bulk  of 
our  workforce  and  were  supposed  to  benefit  from  free  trade—are  now  having  their 
jobs  outsourced  to  countries  like  India.  It  is  estimated  that  3.3  million  white  collar 
jobs will be offshored by 2015. 

That is why it is critical to review the department’s programs to assist U.S. busi-
nesses  in  light  of  these  disturbing  trends.  The  International  Trade  Administration 
has both the mandate and the obligation to assess the impact of trade liberalization 
on U.S. industries, as well as to secure the access of U.S. businesses to foreign mar-
kets.  As  we  approach  a  potentially  contentious  debate  over  the  reauthorization  of 
‘‘Fast-Track’’ Trade Promotion Authority, the Congress must ensure that the depart-
ment,  like  other  Executive  Branch  agencies,  is  fulfilling  its  role  to  the  benefit  of 
American workers, rather than mechanically toeing the free trade line. 

Because  only  when  the  Department  is  acting  in  the  interests  of  U.S.  businesses 
and the Americans they employ—not on behalf of a particular ideology—can it truly 
serve as the beacon which adorns its official seal, guiding our economy toward secu-
rity and prosperity. 

Æ 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  08:56 Sep 17, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00052 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6611 S:\GPO\DOCS\75785.TXT JACKIE

